CLUSTER NAME :SENIOR CONSULTANT - TECH AND IMPL CONSUMER GOODS-VCO - L1
CLUSTER SKILLS : SSIS (L2), Application Testing (L2), Business Analysis (L1), Agile-Scrum (L1), SaaS (L2), Consumer Goods Value Chain Optimization (L2), BY Warehouse management System (L2)
Job Role: Senior Consultant - Tech and Impl Consumer Goods-VCO
The Senior Consultant - Tech and Impl Consumer Goods-VCO will be responsible for utilizing expertise in SSIS and Application Testing to optimize the consumer goods value chain. They will apply advanced knowledge of SaaS and BY Warehouse Management System to drive business analysis and agile-scrum methodologies in the consumer goods industry.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in SSIS and Application Testing to optimize the consumer goods value chain.
Apply advanced knowledge of SaaS to drive business analysis and agile-scrum methodologies.
Demonstrate proficiency in BY Warehouse Management System to enhance consumer goods value chain optimization.
Utilize agile-scrum methodologies to drive efficient application testing processes.
Apply consumer goods value chain optimization techniques to enhance business analysis.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in SSIS is essential for this role, with a strong focus on application testing.
Advanced knowledge of SaaS is highly desirable, with the ability to drive business analysis.
Familiarity with BY Warehouse Management System is beneficial, with the capacity to optimize consumer goods value chain.
Experience in application testing is advantageous, with the ability to drive agile-scrum methodologies.
Proficiency in consumer goods value chain optimization is preferred, with the capability to enhance business analysis.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 5 years of relevant experience in consumer goods value chain optimization.
Previous experience in application testing is beneficial, with a focus on agile-scrum proficiency.
Demonstrated proficiency in SSIS and SaaS through consumer goods industry experience.
Proven track record of applying BY Warehouse Management System and application testing in consumer goods value chain optimization.




CLUSTER NAME :LEAD ADMINISTRATOR VMWARE AWS CLOUD - L1
CLUSTER SKILLS : VMware Server Admin (L3), Windows and Vmware Implementation (L2), VMC Vmware on AWS (L3), Vmware HCX (L2)
Job Role: Lead Administrator VMware AWS Cloud

Brief Summary: The Lead Administrator VMware AWS Cloud will be responsible for overseeing the implementation and administration of VMware on AWS cloud infrastructure. They will utilize their expertise in VMware Server Admin, Windows and VMware Implementation, VMC VMware on AWS, and VMware HCX to ensure efficient and effective cloud operations.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in VMware Server Admin and Lead Administrator VMware AWS Cloud to oversee the implementation and administration of VMware on AWS cloud infrastructure.
Apply advanced knowledge of Windows and VMware Implementation to ensure seamless integration and operation of VMware on AWS cloud.
Demonstrate proficiency in VMC VMware on AWS to optimize the performance and scalability of the cloud infrastructure.
Utilize VMware HCX to facilitate secure and efficient workload migration and hybrid cloud deployment.
Apply VMware Server Admin skills to maintain and troubleshoot the VMware on AWS cloud infrastructure.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in VMware Server Admin is essential for this role, with a strong focus on cloud infrastructure management.
Advanced knowledge of Windows and VMware Implementation is highly desirable, with the ability to ensure smooth integration and operation.
Familiarity with VMC VMware on AWS is beneficial, with the capacity to optimize performance and scalability.
Experience in VMware HCX is advantageous, with the ability to facilitate secure workload migration and hybrid cloud deployment.
Proficiency in Lead Administrator VMware AWS Cloud is preferred, with the capability to maintain and troubleshoot the cloud infrastructure.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 5 years of relevant experience in cloud infrastructure management.
Previous experience in VMware server administration and AWS cloud implementation is beneficial, with a focus on efficient cloud operations.
Demonstrated proficiency in VMware Server Admin and Windows and VMware Implementation through successful cloud infrastructure management.
Proven track record of applying VMC VMware on AWS and VMware HCX in optimizing cloud infrastructure performance and workload migration.




CLUSTER NAME :Tools Engineer ASSET MANAGEMENT -SNOW - L3
CLUSTER SKILLS : ITIL Asset-Config Mgmt (L1), Software Asset Management (L1), IT Hardware Asset Management (L1), SNOW Software Asset Management (L2)
Job Role: Tools Engineer ASSET MANAGEMENT -SNOW - L3
The Tools Engineer ASSET MANAGEMENT -SNOW - L3 will be responsible for managing and maintaining the IT asset management tools, with a focus on SNOW software asset management. They will utilize their expertise in asset management tools to ensure efficient and effective utilization of IT resources.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in ITIL Asset-Config Mgmt and Software Asset Management to manage and maintain the IT asset management tools.
Apply advanced knowledge of SNOW Software Asset Management to optimize software asset utilization and compliance.
Demonstrate proficiency in IT Hardware Asset Management to ensure proper tracking and management of hardware assets.
Utilize SNOW Software Asset Management to generate reports and insights for informed decision-making.
Apply IT asset management best practices to ensure compliance and cost-effectiveness.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in ITIL Asset-Config Mgmt is essential for this role, with a strong focus on efficient configuration management.
Advanced knowledge of SNOW Software Asset Management is highly desirable, with the ability to optimize software utilization and compliance.
Familiarity with IT Hardware Asset Management is beneficial, with the capacity to track and manage hardware assets effectively.
Experience in Software Asset Management is advantageous, with the ability to generate insightful reports for decision-making.
Proficiency in SNOW Software Asset Management is preferred, with the capability to ensure compliance and cost-effectiveness.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 3 years of relevant experience in IT asset management.
Previous experience in SNOW Software Asset Management is beneficial, with a focus on optimizing software utilization and compliance.
Demonstrated proficiency in ITIL Asset-Config Mgmt and Software Asset Management through previous experience.
Proven track record of applying IT Hardware Asset Management and SNOW Software Asset Management in IT asset management roles.




CLUSTER NAME :DOMAIN CONSULTANT CORE BANKING - L2
CLUSTER SKILLS : Core Banking (L2), Payments (L1)
Job Role: Domain Consultant Core Banking - L2
As a Domain Consultant Core Banking - L2 at Wipro, you will be responsible for utilizing expertise in Core Banking and Payments to provide advanced consulting services to clients in the banking industry.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in Core Banking and Domain Consultant Core Banking - L2 to provide advanced consulting services to clients.
Apply advanced knowledge of Payments to support and enhance banking systems and processes.
Demonstrate proficiency in domain knowledge to analyze and improve banking operations.
Utilize Core Banking skills to implement and optimize banking solutions.
Apply Payments knowledge to support and enhance payment processing systems.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in Core Banking is essential for this role, with a strong focus on banking operations and systems.
Advanced knowledge of Payments is highly desirable, with the ability to support and enhance payment processing.
Familiarity with domain knowledge is beneficial, with the capacity to analyze and improve banking operations.
Experience in Core Banking is advantageous, with the ability to implement and optimize banking solutions.
Proficiency in Payments is preferred, with the capability to support and enhance payment processing.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 3 years of relevant experience in the banking industry.
Previous experience in Core Banking consulting is beneficial, with a focus on advanced proficiency.
Demonstrated proficiency in Core Banking and Payments through consulting experience.
Proven track record of applying domain knowledge and Core Banking skills in consulting engagements.




CLUSTER NAME :TEST LEAD TEST DATA MANAGEMENT - L1
CLUSTER SKILLS : Mainframe Testing (L1), Python Scripting (L1), Informatica ILM TDM (L2), Broadcom TDM (L3)
Job Role: Test Lead Test Data Management - L1
Brief Summary: The Test Lead Test Data Management - L1 will be responsible for utilizing expertise in Mainframe Testing and Python Scripting to lead and manage test data activities. They will apply advanced knowledge of Informatica ILM TDM and Broadcom TDM to ensure efficient test data management processes.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in Mainframe Testing and Test Lead Test Data Management - L1 to lead and manage test data activities.
Apply advanced knowledge of Python Scripting to automate test data processes.
Demonstrate proficiency in Informatica ILM TDM to ensure secure and compliant test data management.
Utilize Broadcom TDM to optimize test data provisioning and masking processes.
Apply Mainframe Testing to validate test data accuracy and integrity.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in Mainframe Testing is essential for this role, with a strong focus on test data validation and integrity.
Advanced knowledge of Python Scripting is highly desirable, with the ability to automate test data processes.
Familiarity with Informatica ILM TDM is beneficial, with the capacity to ensure secure and compliant test data management.
Experience in Broadcom TDM is advantageous, with the ability to optimize test data provisioning and masking processes.
Proficiency in Test Lead Test Data Management - L1 is preferred, with the capability to lead and manage test data activities.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 3 years of relevant experience in test data management.
Previous experience in test data validation and integrity is beneficial, with a focus on ensuring accurate test data.
Demonstrated proficiency in Mainframe Testing and Python Scripting through test data management experience.
Proven track record of applying Informatica ILM TDM and Broadcom TDM in optimizing test data processes.




CLUSTER NAME :PRODUCT ARCHITECT PRODUCT TEST AUTOMATION API - L1
CLUSTER SKILLS : Core Java (L3), Solution Architecture (L1), Black Box Testing (L3), JAX-RS - Java API- RESTful Web Services (L3), Product Test Automation (L3)
Job Role: Product Architect

Brief Summary: The Product Architect will be responsible for utilizing expertise in Core Java and Solution Architecture to design and architect product solutions. They will also apply advanced knowledge of Black Box Testing and JAX-RS - Java API- RESTful Web Services to ensure the quality and reliability of the product. Additionally, they will demonstrate proficiency in Product Test Automation to automate testing processes and improve product efficiency.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in Core Java and Product Architect to design and architect product solutions.
Apply advanced knowledge of Black Box Testing to ensure the quality and reliability of the product.
Demonstrate proficiency in JAX-RS - Java API- RESTful Web Services to develop and maintain RESTful APIs.
Utilize Solution Architecture to create scalable and reliable product solutions.
Apply Product Test Automation to automate testing processes and improve product efficiency.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in Core Java is essential for this role, with a strong focus on designing and architecting product solutions.
Advanced knowledge of Black Box Testing is highly desirable, with the ability to ensure the quality and reliability of the product.
Familiarity with JAX-RS - Java API- RESTful Web Services is beneficial, with the capacity to develop and maintain RESTful APIs.
Experience in Solution Architecture is advantageous, with the ability to create scalable and reliable product solutions.
Proficiency in Product Test Automation is preferred, with the capability to automate testing processes and improve product efficiency.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 5 years of relevant experience in product architecture and testing.
Previous experience in solution architecture and product testing is beneficial, with a focus on designing and testing scalable product solutions.
Demonstrated proficiency in Core Java and Black Box Testing through previous product architecture and testing experience.
Proven track record of applying JAX-RS - Java API- RESTful Web Services and Solution Architecture in product development and testing.




CLUSTER NAME :PARTNER - ADV. AND MGMT UPSTREAM APPLICATION DEVELOPMENT - L1
CLUSTER SKILLS : C# - CSharp-Programming (L3), .NET (L3), Upstream - Oil and Gas (L3), Upstream Application Development (L4), Unit Testing (L3)
Job Role: Partner - Advanced and Management Upstream Application Development

Brief Summary: The Partner - Advanced and Management Upstream Application Development will be responsible for utilizing expertise in C# - CSharp-Programming and .NET to lead and manage the development of upstream applications in the oil and gas industry. They will also be responsible for implementing unit testing and ensuring the overall success of the application development process.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in C# - CSharp-Programming and .NET to lead and manage the development of upstream applications in the oil and gas industry.
Apply advanced knowledge of Upstream - Oil and Gas to ensure the success of the application development process.
Demonstrate proficiency in Upstream Application Development to drive the innovation and efficiency of the development projects.
Utilize Unit Testing to ensure the quality and reliability of the developed applications.
Apply Upstream - Oil and Gas knowledge to align the application development with industry standards and requirements.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in C# - CSharp-Programming is essential for this role, with a strong focus on leading and managing application development projects.
Advanced knowledge of .NET is highly desirable, with the ability to drive the technical aspects of application development.
Familiarity with Upstream - Oil and Gas is beneficial, with the capacity to align development projects with industry-specific requirements.
Experience in Upstream Application Development is advantageous, with the ability to drive innovation and efficiency in the development process.
Proficiency in Unit Testing is preferred, with the capability to ensure the quality and reliability of developed applications.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 5 years of relevant experience in upstream application development within the oil and gas industry.
Previous experience in leading and managing upstream application development projects is beneficial, with a focus on delivering high-quality solutions.
Demonstrated proficiency in C# - CSharp-Programming and .NET through successful application development projects.
Proven track record of applying Upstream - Oil and Gas knowledge and Unit Testing in the development of industry-specific applications.




CLUSTER NAME :TECHNO FUNCTIONAL CONSULTANT JD EDWARDS WORLDSOFT TECHNICAL - L2
CLUSTER SKILLS : Consulting (L1), AS400 (L2), JDEdwards Worldsoft Technical (L4), JDEdwards Distribution and Logistics (L1), JDEdwards Worldsoft RPGILE (L4)
Job Role: Technical Functional Consultant JD Edwards Worldsoft Technical

Brief Summary: The Technical Functional Consultant JD Edwards Worldsoft Technical will be responsible for utilizing expertise in JDEdwards Worldsoft Technical to provide technical solutions and support for the JDEdwards Distribution and Logistics module. They will apply advanced knowledge of AS400 and JDEdwards Worldsoft RPGILE to develop and customize technical solutions for the JDEdwards Worldsoft system.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in JDEdwards Worldsoft Technical to provide technical solutions and support for the JDEdwards Distribution and Logistics module.
Apply advanced knowledge of AS400 to develop and customize technical solutions for the JDEdwards Worldsoft system.
Demonstrate proficiency in JDEdwards Worldsoft RPGILE to develop and customize technical solutions for the JDEdwards Worldsoft system.
Utilize JDEdwards Distribution and Logistics to optimize and enhance the distribution and logistics processes within the JDEdwards Worldsoft system.
Apply AS400 to integrate and optimize technical solutions within the JDEdwards Worldsoft system.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in JDEdwards Worldsoft Technical is essential for this role, with a strong focus on providing technical solutions and support for the JDEdwards Distribution and Logistics module.
Advanced knowledge of AS400 is highly desirable, with the ability to develop and customize technical solutions for the JDEdwards Worldsoft system.
Familiarity with JDEdwards Worldsoft RPGILE is beneficial, with the capacity to develop and customize technical solutions for the JDEdwards Worldsoft system.
Experience in JDEdwards Distribution and Logistics is advantageous, with the ability to optimize and enhance distribution and logistics processes within the JDEdwards Worldsoft system.
Proficiency in AS400 is preferred, with the capability to integrate and optimize technical solutions within the JDEdwards Worldsoft system.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 5 years of relevant experience in JDEdwards Worldsoft Technical.
Previous experience in JDEdwards Worldsoft RPGILE development is beneficial, with a focus on customizing technical solutions for the JDEdwards Worldsoft system.
Demonstrated proficiency in JDEdwards Worldsoft Technical and AS400 through previous technical consulting experience.
Proven track record of applying JDEdwards Distribution and Logistics and AS400 in technical consulting projects.




CLUSTER NAME :APPLICATION ARCHITECT L2
CLUSTER SKILLS : Architectural Patterns (L2), Architectural Patterns (L2), Architectural Patterns (L2), Architectural Patterns (L2), Architecture and Design Methods (L2), Architecture and Design Methods (L2), Architecture and Design Methods (L2), Architecture and Design Methods (L2), Architecting (L2), Architecting (L2), Architecting (L2), Architecting (L2), Effective Communication (L1), Effective Communication (L1), Effective Communication (L1), Effective Communication (L1), App Modernization - Architecture (L2), App Modernization - Architecture (L2), App Modernization - Architecture (L2), App Modernization - Architecture (L2)
Job Role: Application Architect

Brief Summary: The Application Architect is responsible for utilizing expertise in architectural patterns and design methods to architect and modernize applications, while effectively communicating with stakeholders.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in Architectural Patterns and Application Architect to architect and modernize applications.
Apply advanced knowledge of Architecture and Design Methods to design and implement application architecture.
Demonstrate proficiency in Effective Communication to effectively communicate with stakeholders.
Utilize App Modernization - Architecture to modernize and upgrade applications.
Apply Architecting skills to design and implement effective application solutions.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in Architectural Patterns is essential for this role, with a strong focus on application architecture.
Advanced knowledge of Architecture and Design Methods is highly desirable, with the ability to design and implement application solutions.
Familiarity with Effective Communication is beneficial, with the capacity to communicate effectively with stakeholders.
Experience in App Modernization - Architecture is advantageous, with the ability to modernize and upgrade applications.
Proficiency in Architecting is preferred, with the capability to design effective application solutions.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 5 years of relevant experience in application architecture and design.
Previous experience in application modernization is beneficial, with a focus on modernizing and upgrading applications.
Demonstrated proficiency in Architectural Patterns and Architecture and Design Methods through previous experience.
Proven track record of applying Effective Communication and App Modernization - Architecture in application architecture and design.




CLUSTER NAME :CLIENT ENGAGEMENT PARTNER L3
CLUSTER SKILLS : Business Analysis (L2), Business Analysis (L2), Business Analysis (L2), Business Analysis (L2), Client Centricity (L3), Client Centricity (L3), Client Centricity (L3), Client Centricity (L3), Strategic Perspective (L3), Strategic Perspective (L3), Strategic Perspective (L3), Strategic Perspective (L3)
Job Role: Client Engagement Partner

Brief Summary: The Client Engagement Partner is responsible for building and maintaining strong client relationships, understanding client needs, and ensuring the delivery of high-quality solutions and services.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in Business Analysis (L2) and Client Engagement Partner to understand client requirements and translate them into actionable plans.
Apply advanced knowledge of Client Centricity (L3) to ensure a high level of client satisfaction and retention.
Demonstrate proficiency in Strategic Perspective (L3) to align client goals with the organization's strategic objectives.
Utilize Business Analysis (L2) to analyze client business processes and recommend improvements.
Apply Client Centricity (L3) to proactively address client needs and concerns.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in Business Analysis (L2) is essential for this role, with a strong focus on understanding client business processes and requirements.
Advanced knowledge of Client Centricity (L3) is highly desirable, with the ability to build strong and lasting client relationships.
Familiarity with Strategic Perspective (L3) is beneficial, with the capacity to align client goals with organizational strategies.
Experience in Client Engagement is advantageous, with the ability to effectively communicate and collaborate with clients.
Proficiency in Business Analysis (L2) is preferred, with the capability to analyze and improve client processes.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 5 years of relevant experience in client engagement or business analysis.
Previous experience in client relationship management is beneficial, with a focus on delivering high-quality solutions and services.
Demonstrated proficiency in Business Analysis (L2) and Client Centricity (L3) through successful client engagements.
Proven track record of applying Strategic Perspective (L3) and Business Analysis (L2) in client-focused projects.




CLUSTER NAME :FINANCE - BRS PROCESSOR L4
CLUSTER SKILLS : Corporate Banking (L3), Financial Analysis (L3), Financial Management (L2), Account Reconciliation (L3), Accounts Receivables (L2)
Job Role: Finance - BRS Processor
As a Finance - BRS Processor at Wipro, you will be responsible for utilizing expertise in Corporate Banking, Financial Analysis, and Financial Management to ensure accurate and efficient Bank Reconciliation Statement (BRS) processing. You will also apply advanced knowledge of Account Reconciliation and proficiency in Accounts Receivables to maintain financial accuracy and compliance.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in Corporate Banking and Financial Analysis to ensure accurate Bank Reconciliation Statement processing.
Apply advanced knowledge of Account Reconciliation to maintain financial accuracy and compliance.
Demonstrate proficiency in Financial Management to optimize financial processes and reporting.
Utilize Accounts Receivables to manage and maintain accurate financial records.
Apply Financial Analysis to provide insights and recommendations for financial decision-making.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in Corporate Banking is essential for this role, with a strong focus on accurate BRS processing.
Advanced knowledge of Financial Analysis is highly desirable, with the ability to provide insights and recommendations.
Familiarity with Financial Management is beneficial, with the capacity to optimize financial processes.
Experience in Account Reconciliation is advantageous, with the ability to maintain financial accuracy.
Proficiency in Accounts Receivables is preferred, with the capability to manage accurate financial records.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 5 years of relevant experience in Finance or Banking industry.
Previous experience in Bank Reconciliation Statement processing is beneficial, with a focus on accuracy and compliance.
Demonstrated proficiency in Corporate Banking and Financial Analysis through previous finance roles.
Proven track record of applying Financial Management and Account Reconciliation in financial processes.




CLUSTER NAME :DEVELOPER APPIAN - L4
CLUSTER SKILLS : Appian (L4), Xceptor (L1)
Job Role: Appian Developer
Brief Summary: The role of an Appian Developer involves utilizing expertise in Appian to design, develop, and implement innovative solutions for business process management.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in Appian to design, develop, and implement innovative solutions for business process management.
Apply advanced knowledge of Xceptor to integrate and automate data processing tasks.
Demonstrate proficiency in Appian to troubleshoot and resolve technical issues in business process management.
Utilize Xceptor to automate data extraction, transformation, and loading processes.
Apply Appian to customize and enhance user interfaces for optimal user experience.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in Appian is essential for this role, with a strong focus on designing and implementing business process management solutions.
Advanced knowledge of Xceptor is highly desirable, with the ability to integrate and automate data processing tasks.
Familiarity with business process management is beneficial, with the capacity to troubleshoot and resolve technical issues.
Experience in data extraction, transformation, and loading processes is advantageous, with the ability to automate these tasks using Xceptor.
Proficiency in customizing user interfaces using Appian is preferred, with the capability to enhance user experience.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 3 years of relevant experience in business process management or software development.
Previous experience in implementing Appian solutions is beneficial, with a focus on designing and implementing business process management solutions.
Demonstrated proficiency in Appian and Xceptor through previous project implementations.
Proven track record of applying business process management and data automation skills in previous software development projects.




CLUSTER NAME :FINANCE - PRICING LEAD L1
CLUSTER SKILLS : Finance and Accounting (L1), Cost Benefit Interpretation (L2), Financial Management (L1), Operations Management (L1), Financial Planning & Analysis (L2)
Job Role: Finance - Pricing Lead L1
The Finance - Pricing Lead L1 will be responsible for utilizing expertise in finance and pricing to support the organization in making strategic pricing decisions. They will apply advanced knowledge of cost benefit interpretation to optimize pricing strategies and demonstrate proficiency in financial management to contribute to financial planning and analysis.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in Finance and Pricing Lead L1 to support the organization in making strategic pricing decisions.
Apply advanced knowledge of Cost Benefit Interpretation to optimize pricing strategies.
Demonstrate proficiency in Financial Management to contribute to financial planning and analysis.
Utilize Operations Management to streamline pricing processes.
Apply Financial Planning & Analysis to assess the impact of pricing decisions.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in Finance is essential for this role, with a strong focus on pricing strategies.
Advanced knowledge of Cost Benefit Interpretation is highly desirable, with the ability to optimize pricing decisions.
Familiarity with Financial Management is beneficial, with the capacity to contribute to financial planning and analysis.
Experience in Operations Management is advantageous, with the ability to streamline pricing processes.
Proficiency in Financial Planning & Analysis is preferred, with the capability to assess the impact of pricing decisions.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 3 years of relevant experience in finance and pricing.
Previous experience in cost benefit interpretation is beneficial, with a focus on optimizing pricing decisions.
Demonstrated proficiency in finance and cost benefit interpretation through previous experience.
Proven track record of applying financial management and operations management in pricing strategies.




CLUSTER NAME :DOMAIN CONSULTANT ACTIMIZE - L1
CLUSTER SKILLS : Actimize (L1), Institutional Compliance (L1)
Job Role: Domain Consultant Actimize

Brief Summary: As a Domain Consultant Actimize, you will be responsible for utilizing expertise in Actimize and Institutional Compliance to provide consulting services and solutions to clients in the financial industry.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in Actimize and Institutional Compliance to provide consulting services and solutions to clients.
Apply advanced knowledge of Actimize to ensure compliance with regulatory requirements.
Demonstrate proficiency in Institutional Compliance to develop and implement compliance strategies.
Utilize Actimize solutions to analyze and mitigate financial risks.
Apply Institutional Compliance principles to ensure adherence to industry regulations.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in Actimize is essential for this role, with a strong focus on regulatory compliance.
Advanced knowledge of Institutional Compliance is highly desirable, with the ability to develop and implement compliance strategies.
Familiarity with financial industry regulations is beneficial, with the capacity to ensure adherence to compliance standards.
Experience in risk analysis and mitigation is advantageous, with the ability to implement Actimize solutions effectively.
Proficiency in Institutional Compliance is preferred, with the capability to ensure regulatory adherence.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 3 years of relevant experience in the financial industry.
Previous experience in Actimize consulting is beneficial, with a focus on regulatory compliance proficiency.
Demonstrated proficiency in Actimize and Institutional Compliance through consulting experience.
Proven track record of applying financial industry regulations and risk mitigation strategies in consulting engagements.




CLUSTER NAME :TECHNO FUNCTIONAL CONSULTANT VMWARE AZURE CLOUD - L1
CLUSTER SKILLS : Windows Server Admin (L2), VMware Server Admin (L3), Windows and Vmware Implementation (L2), Datacenter - Wintel Stack (L1), Infra Consulting (L1), Azure Vmware Service (L2)
Job Role: Technical Functional Consultant VMware Azure Cloud

Brief Summary: The Technical Functional Consultant VMware Azure Cloud will be responsible for utilizing expertise in Windows Server Admin, VMware Server Admin, and Windows and VMware Implementation to provide technical consulting and implementation services for Azure VMware Service.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in Windows Server Admin and VMware Server Admin to provide technical consulting and implementation services for Azure VMware Service.
Apply advanced knowledge of Windows and VMware Implementation to ensure successful deployment and management of Azure VMware Service.
Demonstrate proficiency in Datacenter - Wintel Stack to optimize the performance and reliability of Azure VMware Service.
Utilize Infra Consulting skills to provide strategic guidance and recommendations for Azure VMware Service implementation.
Apply Azure VMware Service knowledge to troubleshoot and resolve technical issues and optimize performance.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in Windows Server Admin is essential for this role, with a strong focus on Azure VMware Service implementation.
Advanced knowledge of VMware Server Admin is highly desirable, with the ability to effectively deploy and manage Azure VMware Service.
Familiarity with Windows and VMware Implementation is beneficial, with the capacity to ensure seamless integration and performance optimization.
Experience in Datacenter - Wintel Stack is advantageous, with the ability to maintain a stable and reliable infrastructure for Azure VMware Service.
Proficiency in Infra Consulting is preferred, with the capability to provide strategic guidance for Azure VMware Service implementation.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 3 years of relevant experience in the IT industry, with a focus on VMware and Azure cloud technologies.
Previous experience in Azure VMware Service implementation is beneficial, with a focus on optimizing performance and reliability.
Demonstrated proficiency in Windows Server Admin and VMware Server Admin through successful deployment and management of Azure VMware Service.
Proven track record of applying Windows and VMware Implementation and Datacenter - Wintel Stack in optimizing infrastructure for Azure VMware Service.




CLUSTER NAME :DEVELOPER MAINFRAME IDMS - L1
CLUSTER SKILLS : DB2 - Z/OS Application Programming (L1), JCL - Job Control Language (L1), COBOL (L1), VSAM (L1), CA-IDMS (L1)
Job Role: Mainframe IDMS Developer
The Mainframe IDMS Developer is responsible for utilizing expertise in DB2 - Z/OS Application Programming, JCL - Job Control Language, COBOL, VSAM, and CA-IDMS to develop and maintain applications on the mainframe platform.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in DB2 - Z/OS Application Programming and Mainframe IDMS Developer to develop and maintain applications on the mainframe platform.
Apply advanced knowledge of JCL - Job Control Language to create and manage job control scripts for mainframe applications.
Demonstrate proficiency in COBOL to write and maintain mainframe application code.
Utilize VSAM for data management and access in mainframe applications.
Apply CA-IDMS to design, develop, and maintain database systems on the mainframe platform.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in DB2 - Z/OS Application Programming is essential for this role, with a strong focus on application development and maintenance.
Advanced knowledge of JCL - Job Control Language is highly desirable, with the ability to create and manage job control scripts effectively.
Familiarity with COBOL is beneficial, with the capacity to write and maintain mainframe application code.
Experience in VSAM is advantageous, with the ability to manage data effectively in mainframe applications.
Proficiency in CA-IDMS is preferred, with the capability to design, develop, and maintain database systems on the mainframe platform.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 2-3 years of relevant experience in mainframe application development and maintenance.
Previous experience in mainframe application development and maintenance is beneficial, with a focus on proficiency in DB2, JCL, COBOL, VSAM, and CA-IDMS.
Demonstrated proficiency in DB2 - Z/OS Application Programming and JCL - Job Control Language through hands-on experience.
Proven track record of applying COBOL and VSAM in mainframe application development and maintenance.




CLUSTER NAME :DEVELOPER COLDFUSION - L3
CLUSTER SKILLS : UNIX SHELL PROGRAMMING (L3), ColdFusion (L3)
Job Role: ColdFusion Developer

Brief Summary: The ColdFusion Developer will be responsible for utilizing expertise in ColdFusion to develop and maintain web applications. They will apply advanced knowledge of UNIX Shell Programming to enhance system performance and reliability.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in ColdFusion and UNIX Shell Programming to develop and maintain web applications and enhance system performance.
Apply advanced knowledge of ColdFusion to create dynamic web pages and database interactions.
Demonstrate proficiency in UNIX Shell Programming to automate tasks and improve system efficiency.
Utilize ColdFusion to troubleshoot and debug web application issues.
Apply UNIX Shell Programming to optimize system security and performance.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in ColdFusion is essential for this role, with a strong focus on web application development and maintenance.
Advanced knowledge of UNIX Shell Programming is highly desirable, with the ability to enhance system performance and reliability.
Familiarity with database interactions in ColdFusion is beneficial, with the capacity to create dynamic web pages.
Experience in UNIX Shell Programming is advantageous, with the ability to automate tasks and improve system efficiency.
Proficiency in troubleshooting and debugging in ColdFusion is preferred, with the capability to resolve web application issues.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 3 years of relevant experience in web application development and UNIX Shell Programming.
Previous experience in ColdFusion development is beneficial, with a focus on creating dynamic web pages and database interactions.
Demonstrated proficiency in ColdFusion and UNIX Shell Programming through web application development experience.
Proven track record of applying database interactions and system optimization in ColdFusion and UNIX Shell Programming.




CLUSTER NAME :PRACTICE HEAD L2
CLUSTER SKILLS : Client Centricity (L3), Stakeholder Management (L3), Strategic Perspective (L3), Sales (L3), Leadership (L3), Finance (L3), Solutioning (L3)
Job Role: Practice Head

Brief Summary: The Practice Head is responsible for utilizing expertise in technology and content writing to lead and manage the practice, ensuring the delivery of high-quality solutions and services to clients.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in technology and content writing to lead and manage the practice, ensuring the delivery of high-quality solutions and services to clients.
Apply advanced knowledge of client centricity to effectively manage and meet client expectations.
Demonstrate proficiency in stakeholder management to build and maintain strong relationships with internal and external stakeholders.
Utilize strategic perspective to drive the practice towards achieving long-term goals and objectives.
Apply leadership skills to inspire and guide the team towards success.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in technology and content writing is essential for this role, with a strong focus on delivering high-quality solutions.
Advanced knowledge of client centricity is highly desirable, with the ability to effectively manage client relationships.
Familiarity with stakeholder management is beneficial, with the capacity to build strong relationships.
Experience in leadership is advantageous, with the ability to inspire and guide the team.
Proficiency in strategic perspective is preferred, with the capability to drive the practice towards long-term success.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 8 years of relevant experience in technology and content writing.
Previous experience in leadership and stakeholder management is beneficial, with a focus on delivering high-quality solutions.
Demonstrated proficiency in technology and content writing and client centricity through previous experience.
Proven track record of applying strategic perspective and leadership in driving the practice towards success.




CLUSTER NAME :CORPORATE COMMUNICATION EXECUTIVE L1
CLUSTER SKILLS : Effective Communication (L1), Business Analyst/ Data Analyst(Media) (L1), Communcations & Culture (L1)
Job Role: Corporate Communication Executive
Brief Summary: The Corporate Communication Executive will be responsible for managing and executing communication strategies to enhance the company's brand image and reputation.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in Effective Communication and Corporate Communication Executive to develop and implement communication strategies.
Apply advanced knowledge of Business Analyst/ Data Analyst (Media) to analyze market trends and media data for communication planning.
Demonstrate proficiency in Communications & Culture to ensure effective internal and external communication.
Utilize Business Analyst/ Data Analyst (Media) skills to track and measure the impact of communication strategies.
Apply Effective Communication skills to create engaging content for various communication channels.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in Effective Communication is essential for this role, with a strong focus on creating clear and impactful messages.
Advanced knowledge of Business Analyst/ Data Analyst (Media) is highly desirable, with the ability to analyze media data and market trends effectively.
Familiarity with Communications & Culture is beneficial, with the capacity to understand and adapt to diverse cultural contexts.
Experience in Corporate Communication is advantageous, with the ability to develop and execute communication strategies.
Proficiency in Business Analyst/ Data Analyst (Media) is preferred, with the capability to interpret and present data effectively.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 2 years of relevant experience in Corporate Communication or related field.
Previous experience in Business Analyst/ Data Analyst (Media) is beneficial, with a focus on analyzing media data and market trends.
Demonstrated proficiency in Effective Communication and Business Analyst/ Data Analyst (Media) through previous work experience.
Proven track record of applying Communications & Culture and Business Analyst/ Data Analyst (Media) in communication planning and execution.




CLUSTER NAME :DOMAIN ENGAGEMENT PARTNER INVESTMENT BANKING - RISK AND COMPLIANCE - L3
CLUSTER SKILLS : Delivery Management (L2), Program Management (L4), Investment Banking (L4), Institutional Compliance (L4)
Job Role: Domain Engagement Partner Investment Banking - Risk and Compliance

Brief Summary: The Domain Engagement Partner in Investment Banking - Risk and Compliance will be responsible for utilizing expertise in risk and compliance within the investment banking domain to ensure regulatory adherence and mitigate risks.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in risk and compliance within the investment banking domain to ensure regulatory adherence and mitigate risks.
Apply advanced knowledge of program management to effectively oversee and manage risk and compliance initiatives.
Demonstrate proficiency in delivery management to ensure efficient and timely execution of risk and compliance strategies.
Utilize institutional compliance skills to maintain adherence to industry regulations and standards.
Apply investment banking expertise to provide strategic guidance on risk and compliance matters.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in risk and compliance within the investment banking domain is essential for this role, with a strong focus on regulatory adherence and risk mitigation.
Advanced knowledge of program management is highly desirable, with the ability to effectively oversee risk and compliance initiatives.
Familiarity with delivery management is beneficial, with the capacity to ensure efficient execution of risk and compliance strategies.
Experience in institutional compliance is advantageous, with the ability to maintain adherence to industry regulations and standards.
Proficiency in investment banking is preferred, with the capability to provide strategic guidance on risk and compliance matters.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 5 years of relevant experience in investment banking risk and compliance.
Previous experience in institutional compliance is beneficial, with a focus on maintaining regulatory adherence.
Demonstrated proficiency in risk and compliance within the investment banking domain through previous experience.
Proven track record of applying program management and institutional compliance in risk and compliance initiatives.




CLUSTER NAME :PRODUCTION SPECIALIST INSURANCE - BEREAVEMENT  - L2
CLUSTER SKILLS : Insurance Products (L3), Communcations & Culture (L3), Defined Benefit (DB) (L3), Defined Contributions (DC) (L3)
Job Role: Production Specialist Insurance - Bereavement
The Production Specialist Insurance - Bereavement is responsible for utilizing expertise in Insurance Products, Communications & Culture, Defined Benefit (DB), and Defined Contributions (DC) to efficiently handle bereavement-related insurance processes and provide support to clients during difficult times.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in Insurance Products and Bereavement role to efficiently handle bereavement-related insurance processes.
Apply advanced knowledge of Communications & Culture to effectively communicate with clients and provide support during difficult times.
Demonstrate proficiency in Defined Benefit (DB) to ensure accurate processing of benefits related to bereavement cases.
Utilize Defined Contributions (DC) to provide guidance and support to clients in managing their contributions and benefits during bereavement.
Apply Insurance Products knowledge to ensure compliance and accuracy in bereavement-related insurance processes.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in Insurance Products is essential for this role, with a strong focus on bereavement-related insurance processes.
Advanced knowledge of Communications & Culture is highly desirable, with the ability to effectively communicate and provide support during difficult times.
Familiarity with Defined Benefit (DB) is beneficial, with the capacity to ensure accurate processing of benefits related to bereavement cases.
Experience in Defined Contributions (DC) is advantageous, with the ability to provide guidance and support to clients in managing their contributions and benefits during bereavement.
Proficiency in Insurance Products is preferred, with the capability to ensure compliance and accuracy in bereavement-related insurance processes.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 2 years of relevant experience in insurance industry.
Previous experience in bereavement-related insurance processes is beneficial, with a focus on efficient handling and client support.
Demonstrated proficiency in Insurance Products and Communications & Culture through previous experience.
Proven track record of applying Defined Benefit (DB) and Defined Contributions (DC) in insurance industry.




CLUSTER NAME :VLSI ENGINEER DFT - L3
CLUSTER SKILLS : ATPG VLSI Test Pattern Generation (L3), Boundary and Scan synthesis (L1), VLSI Memory BIST and Boundary SCAN (L2), VLSI Design For Testability - DFT (L3)
Job Role: VLSI Engineer DFT - L3
As a VLSI Engineer DFT - L3, you will be responsible for utilizing expertise in ATPG VLSI Test Pattern Generation and Boundary and Scan synthesis to ensure efficient test pattern generation and synthesis. You will apply advanced knowledge of VLSI Memory BIST and Boundary SCAN to enhance the memory testing capabilities. Additionally, you will demonstrate proficiency in VLSI Design For Testability (DFT) to implement effective DFT techniques in VLSI designs. 

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in ATPG VLSI Test Pattern Generation and Boundary and Scan synthesis to ensure efficient test pattern generation and synthesis.
Apply advanced knowledge of VLSI Memory BIST and Boundary SCAN to enhance the memory testing capabilities.
Demonstrate proficiency in VLSI Design For Testability (DFT) to implement effective DFT techniques in VLSI designs.
Utilize VLSI ENGINEER DFT to ensure the design meets testability requirements.
Apply VLSI Design For Testability (DFT) techniques to improve the testability of VLSI designs.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in ATPG VLSI Test Pattern Generation is essential for this role, with a strong focus on efficient test pattern generation.
Advanced knowledge of Boundary and Scan synthesis is highly desirable, with the ability to implement effective synthesis techniques.
Familiarity with VLSI Memory BIST and Boundary SCAN is beneficial, with the capacity to enhance memory testing capabilities.
Experience in VLSI Design For Testability (DFT) is advantageous, with the ability to implement DFT techniques effectively.
Proficiency in VLSI ENGINEER DFT is preferred, with the capability to ensure the design meets testability requirements.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 5 years of relevant experience in the VLSI industry.
Previous experience in VLSI Design For Testability (DFT) is beneficial, with a focus on implementing DFT techniques.
Demonstrated proficiency in ATPG VLSI Test Pattern Generation and Boundary and Scan synthesis through previous work experience.
Proven track record of applying VLSI Memory BIST and Boundary SCAN in VLSI designs.




CLUSTER NAME :TECHNOLOGY ARCHITECT DATACOM LAYER2 - L1
CLUSTER SKILLS : Linux Systems Programming (L2), C Programming (L2), Telecom Switching Routing NE Layer2 SW (L2), Linux Application Programming (L2)
Job Role: Technology Architect Datacom Layer2

Brief Summary: The Technology Architect Datacom Layer2 will be responsible for utilizing expertise in Linux Systems Programming, C Programming, Telecom Switching Routing NE Layer2 SW, and Linux Application Programming to design and architect data communication solutions at Layer 2.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in Linux Systems Programming and Technology Architect Datacom Layer2 to design and implement efficient data communication solutions.
Apply advanced knowledge of C Programming to develop and optimize software for data communication at Layer 2.
Demonstrate proficiency in Telecom Switching Routing NE Layer2 SW to ensure smooth operation and performance of network elements.
Utilize Linux Application Programming to develop and maintain applications for data communication at Layer 2.
Apply Technology Architect Datacom Layer2 skills to provide technical guidance and support for Layer 2 data communication solutions.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in Linux Systems Programming is essential for this role, with a strong focus on designing and implementing network solutions.
Advanced knowledge of C Programming is highly desirable, with the ability to develop and optimize software for data communication.
Familiarity with Telecom Switching Routing NE Layer2 SW is beneficial, with the capacity to ensure smooth operation of network elements.
Experience in Linux Application Programming is advantageous, with the ability to develop and maintain applications for data communication.
Proficiency in Technology Architect Datacom Layer2 is preferred, with the capability to provide technical guidance for Layer 2 data communication solutions.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 5 years of relevant experience in the technology and data communication field.
Previous experience in designing and implementing Layer 2 data communication solutions is beneficial, with a focus on network efficiency.
Demonstrated proficiency in Linux Systems Programming and C Programming through previous project experience.
Proven track record of applying Telecom Switching Routing NE Layer2 SW and Linux Application Programming in data communication solutions.




CLUSTER NAME :DEVELOPER AUTOMOTIVE SAFETY AND COMPLIANCE - L1
CLUSTER SKILLS : ASPICE (L1), Automotive Functional Safety (L1)
Job Role: Developer Automotive Safety and Compliance - L1
This role involves utilizing expertise in ASPICE (L1) and Automotive Functional Safety (L1) to ensure compliance with safety standards and regulations in the automotive industry.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in ASPICE (L1) and Automotive Functional Safety (L1) to ensure compliance with safety standards and regulations in the automotive industry.
Apply advanced knowledge of Automotive Functional Safety (L1) to implement safety measures and protocols in automotive development processes.
Demonstrate proficiency in ASPICE (L1) to assess and improve the quality and safety of automotive software and systems.
Utilize Automotive Functional Safety (L1) to conduct safety analyses and risk assessments for automotive products.
Apply ASPICE (L1) to ensure adherence to safety and compliance requirements throughout the automotive development lifecycle.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in ASPICE (L1) is essential for this role, with a strong focus on safety and compliance standards.
Advanced knowledge of Automotive Functional Safety (L1) is highly desirable, with the ability to implement safety measures and protocols.
Familiarity with automotive safety standards and regulations is beneficial, with the capacity to ensure compliance.
Experience in ASPICE (L1) is advantageous, with the ability to assess and improve software quality and safety.
Proficiency in Automotive Functional Safety (L1) is preferred, with the capability to conduct safety analyses and risk assessments.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 2 years of relevant experience in automotive safety and compliance.
Previous experience in implementing safety measures and protocols is beneficial, with a focus on safety standards.
Demonstrated proficiency in ASPICE (L1) and Automotive Functional Safety (L1) through automotive safety and compliance experience.
Proven track record of applying safety analyses and risk assessments in automotive safety and compliance.




CLUSTER NAME :ASSOCIATE HR - BACKGROUND VERIFICATION L2
CLUSTER SKILLS : Effective Communication (L1), Human Resources (L2), MIS (L1), WHRS - Resource Management (L1)
Job Role: Associate HR - Background Verification

Brief Summary: The Associate HR - Background Verification will be responsible for conducting thorough background checks on potential employees to ensure the company's hiring standards are met and maintained.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in Human Resources and Associate HR - Background Verification to conduct comprehensive background checks on potential employees.
Apply advanced knowledge of MIS to maintain accurate and up-to-date records of background verification processes.
Demonstrate proficiency in WHRS - Resource Management to effectively manage and allocate resources for background verification tasks.
Utilize effective communication skills to liaise with relevant stakeholders and convey background verification findings.
Apply HR expertise to ensure compliance with company policies and legal requirements during the background verification process.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in Human Resources is essential for this role, with a strong focus on conducting background verification processes.
Advanced knowledge of MIS is highly desirable, with the ability to maintain accurate and organized records of background verification activities.
Familiarity with WHRS - Resource Management is beneficial, with the capacity to effectively allocate resources for background verification tasks.
Experience in background verification processes is advantageous, with the ability to conduct thorough and compliant checks.
Proficiency in effective communication is preferred, with the capability to convey background verification findings clearly and professionally.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 2 years of relevant experience in Human Resources or background verification.
Previous experience in conducting background verification is beneficial, with a focus on maintaining accurate and compliant records.
Demonstrated proficiency in Human Resources and MIS through previous HR or background verification roles.
Proven track record of applying WHRS - Resource Management and effective communication in HR or background verification settings.




CLUSTER NAME :FINANCE - AP HEAD L1
CLUSTER SKILLS : Finance and Accounting (L3), Financial Services (L2), Effective Communication (L1), Account Performance Analysis (L2), Accounts Receivables (L3), Financial Planning & Analysis (L3)
Job Role: Finance - AP Head
The Finance - AP Head is responsible for overseeing the Accounts Payable function and ensuring efficient and accurate processing of payments and invoices. They play a crucial role in managing the financial aspects of the organization and ensuring compliance with accounting standards and regulations.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in Finance and Accounting to oversee and manage the Accounts Payable function.
Apply advanced knowledge of Account Performance Analysis to monitor and improve the performance of the Accounts Payable process.
Demonstrate proficiency in Accounts Receivables to ensure timely collection and management of outstanding payments.
Utilize Financial Planning & Analysis to contribute to strategic financial decision-making.
Apply Effective Communication skills to collaborate with internal and external stakeholders for smooth AP operations.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in Finance and Accounting is essential for this role, with a strong focus on compliance and financial management.
Advanced knowledge of Account Performance Analysis is highly desirable, with the ability to identify and implement process improvements.
Familiarity with Accounts Receivables is beneficial, with the capacity to manage outstanding payments effectively.
Experience in Financial Planning & Analysis is advantageous, with the ability to contribute to strategic financial decisions.
Proficiency in Effective Communication is preferred, with the capability to collaborate with stakeholders.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 5 years of relevant experience in Finance and Accounting.
Previous experience in Accounts Payable management is beneficial, with a focus on process efficiency and compliance.
Demonstrated proficiency in Finance and Accounting and Account Performance Analysis through previous roles.
Proven track record of applying Accounts Receivables and Financial Planning & Analysis in financial management.




CLUSTER NAME :PRODUCTION SPECIALIST HEALTHCARE PHARMACOVIGILANCE - CASE INTAKE REGISTRATION AND PROCESSING - L1
CLUSTER SKILLS : Pharmacovigilance &DrugSafety(Med Device (L2), Pharmacovigilance & Drug Safety(Pharma) (L2), Pharmacovigilance& Drug Safety(Pharm-CX) (L2)
Job Role: Production Specialist Healthcare Pharmacovigilance - Case Intake Registration and Processing
The Production Specialist Healthcare Pharmacovigilance - Case Intake Registration and Processing is responsible for efficiently handling the intake, registration, and processing of pharmacovigilance cases in the healthcare industry.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in Pharmacovigilance & Drug Safety (Med Device) and Production Specialist Healthcare Pharmacovigilance - Case Intake Registration and Processing to efficiently handle the intake, registration, and processing of cases.
Apply advanced knowledge of Pharmacovigilance & Drug Safety (Pharma) to ensure accurate and timely processing of pharmacovigilance cases.
Demonstrate proficiency in Pharmacovigilance & Drug Safety (Pharm-CX) to maintain compliance with regulatory requirements during case intake and registration.
Utilize production specialist skills to ensure efficient and accurate processing of healthcare pharmacovigilance cases.
Apply knowledge of healthcare pharmacovigilance to identify and escalate any potential safety concerns.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in Pharmacovigilance & Drug Safety (Med Device) is essential for this role, with a strong focus on accurate case intake and registration.
Advanced knowledge of Pharmacovigilance & Drug Safety (Pharma) is highly desirable, with the ability to ensure timely processing of pharmacovigilance cases.
Familiarity with Pharmacovigilance & Drug Safety (Pharm-CX) is beneficial, with the capacity to maintain compliance with regulatory requirements.
Experience in production specialist skills is advantageous, with the ability to ensure efficient and accurate processing of healthcare pharmacovigilance cases.
Proficiency in healthcare pharmacovigilance is preferred, with the capability to identify and escalate potential safety concerns.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 2 years of relevant experience in healthcare pharmacovigilance.
Previous experience in case intake registration and processing is beneficial, with a focus on accurate and timely processing.
Demonstrated proficiency in Pharmacovigilance & Drug Safety (Med Device) and Pharmacovigilance & Drug Safety (Pharma) through previous experience.
Proven track record of applying Pharmacovigilance & Drug Safety (Pharm-CX) and production specialist skills in healthcare pharmacovigilance.




CLUSTER NAME :DEVELOPER .NET CORE - L1
CLUSTER SKILLS : ADO.NET Entity Framework (L1), ASP.NET Web API (L1), ASP.NET Core (L1)
Job Role: .NET Core Developer
A .NET Core Developer is responsible for utilizing expertise in ADO.NET Entity Framework and ASP.NET Web API to develop and maintain .NET Core applications. They are also responsible for applying advanced knowledge of ASP.NET Core to build scalable and high-performance web applications.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in ADO.NET Entity Framework and ASP.NET Web API to develop and maintain .NET Core applications.
Apply advanced knowledge of ASP.NET Core to build scalable and high-performance web applications.
Demonstrate proficiency in ASP.NET Core to implement security and authentication features.
Utilize ASP.NET Web API to create RESTful services for seamless integration with other systems.
Apply ADO.NET Entity Framework to interact with databases and perform data operations.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in ADO.NET Entity Framework is essential for this role, with a strong focus on database interaction and data operations.
Advanced knowledge of ASP.NET Web API is highly desirable, with the ability to create RESTful services for seamless integration.
Familiarity with ASP.NET Core is beneficial, with the capacity to build scalable and high-performance web applications.
Experience in .NET Core development is advantageous, with the ability to develop and maintain .NET Core applications.
Proficiency in ADO.NET Entity Framework is preferred, with the capability to interact with databases and perform data operations.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 2-3 years of relevant experience in .NET Core development.
Previous experience in developing scalable web applications is beneficial, with a focus on security and authentication features.
Demonstrated proficiency in ADO.NET Entity Framework and ASP.NET Web API through previous development projects.
Proven track record of applying ASP.NET Core and ADO.NET Entity Framework in web application development.




CLUSTER NAME :CYBER SECURITY ARCHITECT VULNERABILITY ASSESMENT AND PENETRATION TESTING - L2
CLUSTER SKILLS : Architecting (L2), Web Penetration Testing - SAC (L4), Vulnerability Management (L4), Penetration Testing - PT (L4)
Job Role: Cyber Security Architect

Brief Summary: The Cyber Security Architect is responsible for utilizing expertise in Vulnerability Management and Penetration Testing to assess and enhance the security posture of the organization. They play a crucial role in designing and implementing security solutions to protect against cyber threats.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in Vulnerability Management and Penetration Testing to assess and enhance the security posture of the organization.
Apply advanced knowledge of Web Penetration Testing to identify and address security vulnerabilities in web applications.
Demonstrate proficiency in Architecting to design and implement robust security solutions.
Utilize Penetration Testing to simulate cyber attacks and identify potential weaknesses in the organization's security infrastructure.
Apply Vulnerability Management to prioritize and remediate security vulnerabilities based on risk assessment.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in Architecting is essential for this role, with a strong focus on designing secure and resilient systems.
Advanced knowledge of Web Penetration Testing is highly desirable, with the ability to identify and address vulnerabilities in web applications.
Familiarity with Vulnerability Management is beneficial, with the capacity to prioritize and remediate security vulnerabilities.
Experience in Penetration Testing is advantageous, with the ability to simulate cyber attacks and identify weaknesses.
Proficiency in Cyber Security Architect is preferred, with the capability to assess and enhance security posture.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 5 years of relevant experience in Cyber Security.
Previous experience in Vulnerability Assessment and Penetration Testing is beneficial, with a focus on assessing and enhancing security posture.
Demonstrated proficiency in Architecting and Web Penetration Testing through hands-on experience.
Proven track record of applying Vulnerability Management and Penetration Testing in real-world scenarios.




CLUSTER NAME :LEAD ADMINISTRATOR WSIC IOT - L2
CLUSTER SKILLS : Python Scripting (L2), M365 PowerShell (L2), Node JS (L1), WSiC-IoT platform (L3), WSiC-IoT edge App (L3), WSiC-IoT edge gateway devices (L2), WSiC-Platform Support (L3), WSiC Integrated Building Mgmt System (L2), WSiC Video analytics (L1), WSiC Agent firmware (L1)
Job Role: Lead Administrator WSiC IoT - L2
Brief Summary: The Lead Administrator WSiC IoT - L2 will be responsible for utilizing expertise in WSiC-IoT platform and WSiC-IoT edge gateway devices to support and administer the WSiC Integrated Building Management System. They will also be involved in managing WSiC Agent firmware and providing support for the WSiC platform.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in WSiC-IoT platform and WSiC-IoT edge gateway devices to support and administer the WSiC Integrated Building Management System.
Apply advanced knowledge of M365 PowerShell to automate and manage tasks related to WSiC-IoT platform.
Demonstrate proficiency in Python Scripting to develop and maintain scripts for WSiC-IoT edge App and WSiC Agent firmware.
Utilize Node JS for customizing and extending functionalities of WSiC-IoT platform.
Apply WSiC Video analytics for monitoring and analyzing video data in the WSiC Integrated Building Management System.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in WSiC-IoT platform is essential for this role, with a strong focus on supporting and administering the WSiC Integrated Building Management System.
Advanced knowledge of M365 PowerShell is highly desirable, with the ability to automate and manage tasks related to the WSiC-IoT platform.
Familiarity with Node JS is beneficial, with the capacity to customize and extend functionalities of the WSiC-IoT platform.
Experience in Python Scripting is advantageous, with the ability to develop and maintain scripts for WSiC-IoT edge App and WSiC Agent firmware.
Proficiency in WSiC Video analytics is preferred, with the capability to monitor and analyze video data in the WSiC Integrated Building Management System.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 5 years of relevant experience in IoT and building management systems.
Previous experience in administering and supporting WSiC-IoT platform is beneficial, with a focus on WSiC Integrated Building Management System.
Demonstrated proficiency in WSiC-IoT platform and M365 PowerShell through previous experience.
Proven track record of applying Node JS and Python Scripting in customizing and maintaining WSiC-IoT platform.




CLUSTER NAME :LEAD ADMINISTRATOR WIRELESS ADMIN - L3
CLUSTER SKILLS : Network Data Admin (L3), CISCO Wireless Admin (L3), SD-WAN Admin (L1), Aruba Wireless Admin (L3)
Job Role: Lead Administrator Wireless Admin

Brief Summary: The Lead Administrator Wireless Admin will be responsible for overseeing and managing the wireless network infrastructure, ensuring its smooth operation and security. They will utilize their expertise in network data administration, CISCO wireless administration, SD-WAN administration, and Aruba wireless administration to lead and support the wireless network team.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in network data administration and wireless administration to oversee and manage the wireless network infrastructure.
Apply advanced knowledge of CISCO wireless administration to ensure the security and optimal performance of the wireless network.
Demonstrate proficiency in SD-WAN administration to implement and maintain SD-WAN solutions for the wireless network.
Utilize Aruba wireless administration to configure and troubleshoot Aruba wireless network components.
Apply network data administration skills to monitor and optimize the wireless network for maximum efficiency.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in network data administration is essential for this role, with a strong focus on network security and performance optimization.
Advanced knowledge of CISCO wireless administration is highly desirable, with the ability to implement and manage CISCO wireless solutions.
Familiarity with SD-WAN administration is beneficial, with the capacity to deploy and maintain SD-WAN solutions for wireless networks.
Experience in Aruba wireless administration is advantageous, with the ability to configure and troubleshoot Aruba wireless network components.
Proficiency in network data administration is preferred, with the capability to monitor and optimize wireless networks.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 5 years of relevant experience in wireless network administration.
Previous experience in leading wireless network administration teams is beneficial, with a focus on implementing and managing wireless solutions.
Demonstrated proficiency in network data administration and CISCO wireless administration through previous network administration roles.
Proven track record of applying SD-WAN administration and Aruba wireless administration in optimizing wireless network performance.




CLUSTER NAME :Developer Enterprise Platform Engineering Frontend Angular - L1
CLUSTER SKILLS : Enterprise Platform UI Frameworks (L1), Enterprise Platform Engineering FrontEnd (L1), Angular 14 (L1)
Job Role: Angular Developer

Brief Summary: The Angular Developer will be responsible for utilizing expertise in Angular 14 and Enterprise Platform UI Frameworks to develop and maintain the front-end of enterprise platform engineering applications.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in Enterprise Platform UI Frameworks and Angular Developer to develop and maintain front-end applications.
Apply advanced knowledge of Enterprise Platform Engineering FrontEnd to enhance user interface and user experience.
Demonstrate proficiency in Angular 14 to create dynamic and responsive web applications.
Utilize Enterprise Platform Engineering Frontend to integrate front-end with back-end services.
Apply Angular 14 to implement and maintain front-end security features.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in Enterprise Platform UI Frameworks is essential for this role, with a strong focus on creating user interfaces for enterprise applications.
Advanced knowledge of Enterprise Platform Engineering FrontEnd is highly desirable, with the ability to enhance front-end performance and scalability.
Familiarity with Angular 14 is beneficial, with the capacity to develop dynamic web applications.
Experience in Enterprise Platform Engineering Frontend is advantageous, with the ability to integrate front-end with back-end services.
Proficiency in Angular 14 is preferred, with the capability to implement front-end security features.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 2-3 years of relevant experience in front-end development for enterprise platforms.
Previous experience in developing dynamic web applications is beneficial, with a focus on creating scalable and responsive user interfaces.
Demonstrated proficiency in Enterprise Platform UI Frameworks and Enterprise Platform Engineering FrontEnd through previous front-end development experience.
Proven track record of applying Angular 14 and Enterprise Platform Engineering Frontend in developing and maintaining enterprise front-end applications.




CLUSTER NAME :Technical Consultant SAP ALM - L2
CLUSTER SKILLS : SAP Solution Manager (L3), DevOps (L3), SAP Activate Methodology (L3), SAP BTP AI/ML (L3), SAP Cloud ALM (L3), SAP BTP Admin (L3)
Job Role: Technical Consultant SAP ALM - L2

Brief Summary: The Technical Consultant SAP ALM - L2 will be responsible for utilizing expertise in SAP Solution Manager, DevOps, SAP Activate Methodology, SAP BTP AI/ML, SAP Cloud ALM, and SAP BTP Admin to provide technical consulting and support for SAP Application Lifecycle Management.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in SAP Solution Manager and DevOps to provide technical consulting and support for SAP ALM.
Apply advanced knowledge of SAP Activate Methodology to streamline and optimize the application lifecycle management process.
Demonstrate proficiency in SAP BTP AI/ML to integrate advanced analytics and machine learning into the SAP ALM framework.
Utilize SAP Cloud ALM to ensure efficient and effective cloud-based application lifecycle management.
Apply SAP BTP Admin skills to manage and administer the SAP Business Technology Platform for ALM purposes.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in SAP Solution Manager is essential for this role, with a strong focus on technical consulting and support for ALM.
Advanced knowledge of DevOps is highly desirable, with the ability to streamline and automate the ALM processes.
Familiarity with SAP Activate Methodology is beneficial, with the capacity to optimize the application lifecycle management.
Experience in SAP BTP Admin is advantageous, with the ability to effectively administer the Business Technology Platform for ALM purposes.
Proficiency in SAP BTP AI/ML is preferred, with the capability to integrate advanced analytics and machine learning into ALM.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 3-5 years of relevant experience in SAP Application Lifecycle Management.
Previous experience in technical consulting and support for ALM is beneficial, with a focus on SAP Solution Manager proficiency.
Demonstrated proficiency in SAP Activate Methodology and DevOps through previous ALM projects.
Proven track record of applying SAP BTP Admin and SAP BTP AI/ML in the context of ALM.




CLUSTER NAME :ADMINISTRATOR PLM - TEAMCENTER - L3
CLUSTER SKILLS : PLM-Teamcenter Application (L2), PLM-TeamCenter Administration (L3)
Job Role: Administrator PLM - Teamcenter - L3
This role involves overseeing the administration of PLM-Teamcenter application, utilizing expertise in PLM-Teamcenter Administration to ensure smooth functioning of the system and support the team in utilizing the platform effectively.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in PLM-Teamcenter Application (L2) and PLM-TeamCenter Administration (L3) to oversee the administration of the system.
Apply advanced knowledge of PLM-TeamCenter Administration (L3) to optimize the functionality and performance of the platform.
Demonstrate proficiency in PLM-Teamcenter Application (L2) to support and troubleshoot issues related to the application.
Utilize PLM-TeamCenter Administration (L3) to customize and configure the system based on the team's requirements.
Apply PLM-Teamcenter Application (L2) to provide training and guidance to the team on utilizing the platform effectively.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in PLM-Teamcenter Application (L2) is essential for this role, with a strong focus on application customization and support.
Advanced knowledge of PLM-TeamCenter Administration (L3) is highly desirable, with the ability to optimize system performance and configuration.
Familiarity with PLM-Teamcenter Application (L2) is beneficial, with the capacity to troubleshoot and provide support.
Experience in PLM-TeamCenter Administration (L3) is advantageous, with the ability to customize and configure the system.
Proficiency in PLM-Teamcenter Application (L2) is preferred, with the capability to provide training and guidance.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 3-5 years of relevant experience in PLM-Teamcenter administration.
Previous experience in system customization and configuration is beneficial, with a focus on optimizing system performance.
Demonstrated proficiency in PLM-Teamcenter Application (L2) and PLM-TeamCenter Administration (L3) through hands-on administration experience.
Proven track record of applying PLM-Teamcenter Application (L2) and PLM-TeamCenter Administration (L3) in supporting and customizing the platform.




CLUSTER NAME :BUSINESS ANALYST INFOR EAM FUNCTIONAL - L3
CLUSTER SKILLS : Business Analysis (L3), Infor EAM - Functional (L2)
Job Role: Business Analyst Infor EAM Functional

Brief Summary: The Business Analyst Infor EAM Functional will be responsible for utilizing expertise in Business Analysis and Infor EAM Functional to analyze and improve business processes and systems.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in Business Analysis and Infor EAM Functional to analyze and improve business processes and systems.
Apply advanced knowledge of Business Analysis to gather and document business requirements.
Demonstrate proficiency in communication and stakeholder management to ensure successful project delivery.
Utilize data analysis skills to identify trends and insights for informed decision-making.
Apply problem-solving skills to address complex business challenges.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in Business Analysis is essential for this role, with a strong focus on gathering and documenting business requirements.
Advanced knowledge of Infor EAM Functional is highly desirable, with the ability to analyze and improve business processes using the software.
Familiarity with communication and stakeholder management is beneficial, with the capacity to ensure successful project delivery.
Experience in data analysis is advantageous, with the ability to identify trends and insights for informed decision-making.
Proficiency in problem-solving is preferred, with the capability to address complex business challenges.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 3 years of relevant experience in Business Analysis and Infor EAM Functional.
Previous experience in analyzing and improving business processes using Infor EAM Functional is beneficial, with a focus on successful project delivery.
Demonstrated proficiency in Business Analysis and Infor EAM Functional through previous project experience.
Proven track record of applying communication and data analysis skills in business analysis projects.




CLUSTER NAME :DOMAIN CONSULTANT MARKET RISK - L4
CLUSTER SKILLS : Market Risk (L3), Institutional Compliance (L4)
Job Role: Domain Consultant Market Risk

Brief Summary: As a Domain Consultant Market Risk at Wipro, you will be responsible for utilizing expertise in Market Risk and Institutional Compliance to provide strategic guidance and solutions to clients in the financial industry.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in Market Risk and Institutional Compliance to provide strategic guidance and solutions to clients.
Apply advanced knowledge of Market Risk to assess and mitigate potential risks for clients.
Demonstrate proficiency in Institutional Compliance to ensure adherence to regulatory requirements.
Utilize financial industry knowledge to analyze market trends and provide insights to clients.
Apply risk management strategies to optimize clients' market performance.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in Market Risk is essential for this role, with a strong focus on risk assessment and mitigation.
Advanced knowledge of Institutional Compliance is highly desirable, with the ability to develop and implement compliance strategies.
Familiarity with financial industry regulations is beneficial, with the capacity to ensure regulatory adherence.
Experience in risk management is advantageous, with the ability to develop and implement risk mitigation strategies.
Proficiency in market analysis is preferred, with the capability to provide strategic insights to clients.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 5 years of relevant experience in the financial industry.
Previous experience in market risk assessment and institutional compliance is beneficial, with a focus on strategic proficiency.
Demonstrated proficiency in Market Risk and Institutional Compliance through previous consulting experience.
Proven track record of applying risk management strategies and regulatory compliance in the financial industry.




CLUSTER NAME :SOLUTION ARCHITECT AS400 ARCHITECTING - L1
CLUSTER SKILLS : AS400 - Architecting (L1), Legacy Modernization (L1)
Job Role: Solution Architect AS400 Architecting - L1
Summary: The Solution Architect AS400 Architecting - L1 will be responsible for utilizing expertise in AS400 Architecting to design and implement solutions for legacy modernization.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in AS400 Architecting to design and implement solutions for legacy modernization.
Apply advanced knowledge of Legacy Modernization to assess and upgrade existing AS400 systems.
Demonstrate proficiency in solution architecture to create technical designs and documentation.
Utilize AS400 skills to troubleshoot and resolve technical issues in legacy systems.
Apply legacy modernization techniques to improve system performance and efficiency.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in AS400 Architecting is essential for this role, with a strong focus on legacy modernization.
Advanced knowledge of Legacy Modernization is highly desirable, with the ability to assess and upgrade existing AS400 systems.
Familiarity with solution architecture is beneficial, with the capacity to create technical designs and documentation.
Experience in AS400 skills is advantageous, with the ability to troubleshoot and resolve technical issues.
Proficiency in legacy modernization techniques is preferred, with the capability to improve system performance and efficiency.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 3 years of relevant experience in AS400 architecture and legacy modernization.
Previous experience in legacy system assessment and upgrade is beneficial, with a focus on AS400 proficiency.
Demonstrated proficiency in AS400 Architecting and Legacy Modernization through previous project experience.
Proven track record of applying solution architecture and legacy modernization techniques in system improvement projects.




CLUSTER NAME :DEVELOPER PYTHON FOR DATA SCIENCE - L1
CLUSTER SKILLS : Python Scripting (L1), Python for Data Science (L1)
Job Role: Developer Python for Data Science - L1
Brief Summary: The Developer Python for Data Science - L1 will be responsible for utilizing expertise in Python Scripting and Python for Data Science to develop and implement data science solutions.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in Python Scripting and Python for Data Science to develop and implement data science solutions.
Apply advanced knowledge of Python for Data Science to analyze and interpret complex data sets.
Demonstrate proficiency in Python Scripting to automate data collection and processing tasks.
Utilize Python for Data Science to create visualizations and reports for data analysis.
Apply Python Scripting to optimize and maintain data science workflows.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in Python Scripting is essential for this role, with a strong focus on automating data collection and processing tasks.
Advanced knowledge of Python for Data Science is highly desirable, with the ability to analyze and interpret complex data sets.
Familiarity with data science concepts is beneficial, with the capacity to apply statistical analysis and machine learning algorithms.
Experience in Python Scripting is advantageous, with the ability to automate repetitive tasks and improve efficiency.
Proficiency in Python for Data Science is preferred, with the capability to create visualizations and reports for data analysis.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 2 years of relevant experience in data science or related field.
Previous experience in Python scripting and data analysis is beneficial, with a focus on automating data workflows.
Demonstrated proficiency in Python Scripting and Python for Data Science through previous data science projects.
Proven track record of applying statistical analysis and machine learning algorithms in data science projects.




CLUSTER NAME :CONFIGURATOR HCM CORE - L1
CLUSTER SKILLS : SAP HCM Core (L1), SAP HCM Core (L1), SAP HCM Core (L1), SAP HCM Core (L1), SAP HCM - CATS (L1), SAP HCM - CATS (L1), SAP HCM - CATS (L1), SAP HCM - CATS (L1)
Job Role: SAP HCM Core Configurator

Brief Summary: The SAP HCM Core Configurator is responsible for utilizing expertise in SAP HCM Core and CATS to configure and maintain the SAP HCM system, ensuring smooth and efficient HR processes within the organization.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in SAP HCM Core and CATS to configure and maintain the SAP HCM system.
Apply advanced knowledge of SAP HCM Core to ensure seamless integration and functionality.
Demonstrate proficiency in SAP HCM - CATS to support time and attendance management.
Utilize CONFIGURATOR HCM CORE skills to customize and optimize the SAP HCM system.
Apply SAP HCM - CATS skills to enhance time tracking and reporting capabilities.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in SAP HCM Core is essential for this role, with a strong focus on system configuration and maintenance.
Advanced knowledge of SAP HCM - CATS is highly desirable, with the ability to support time and attendance management processes.
Familiarity with CONFIGURATOR HCM CORE is beneficial, with the capacity to customize and optimize the SAP HCM system.
Experience in SAP HCM - CATS is advantageous, with the ability to enhance time tracking and reporting capabilities.
Proficiency in SAP HCM Core is preferred, with the capability to ensure smooth integration and functionality.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 2-3 years of relevant experience in SAP HCM configuration and maintenance.
Previous experience in SAP HCM system customization is beneficial, with a focus on optimizing HR processes.
Demonstrated proficiency in SAP HCM Core and CATS through hands-on configuration and maintenance experience.
Proven track record of applying CONFIGURATOR HCM CORE and SAP HCM - CATS in enhancing time tracking and reporting capabilities.




CLUSTER NAME :SOLUTION ARCHITECT PLM - TEAMCENTER - L2
CLUSTER SKILLS : Solution Architecture (L2), PLM-Teamcenter-Architecture (L2)
Job Role: Solution Architect PLM - Teamcenter - L2
As a Solution Architect PLM - Teamcenter - L2, you will be responsible for utilizing expertise in Solution Architecture and PLM-Teamcenter-Architecture to design and implement solutions using Teamcenter. You will play a key role in providing technical leadership and guidance for the successful delivery of PLM solutions.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in Solution Architecture and PLM-Teamcenter-Architecture to design and implement solutions using Teamcenter.
Apply advanced knowledge of PLM-Teamcenter-Architecture to provide technical leadership and guidance for PLM solutions.
Demonstrate proficiency in Solution Architecture to ensure the successful delivery of PLM solutions.
Utilize PLM-Teamcenter-Architecture to customize and configure Teamcenter solutions.
Apply Solution Architecture principles to ensure the scalability and reliability of PLM solutions.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in Solution Architecture is essential for this role, with a strong focus on designing scalable and reliable solutions.
Advanced knowledge of PLM-Teamcenter-Architecture is highly desirable, with the ability to customize and configure Teamcenter solutions.
Familiarity with PLM-Teamcenter-Architecture is beneficial, with the capacity to provide technical leadership for PLM solutions.
Experience in Solution Architecture is advantageous, with the ability to design and implement scalable solutions.
Proficiency in PLM-Teamcenter-Architecture is preferred, with the capability to customize and configure Teamcenter solutions.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 5 years of relevant experience in PLM and Solution Architecture.
Previous experience in designing and implementing Teamcenter solutions is beneficial, with a focus on customization and configuration.
Demonstrated proficiency in Solution Architecture and PLM-Teamcenter-Architecture through successful delivery of PLM solutions.
Proven track record of applying PLM-Teamcenter-Architecture in designing scalable and reliable PLM solutions.




CLUSTER NAME :DOMAIN CONSULTANT CETRM-ALLEGRO - L3
CLUSTER SKILLS : .NET (L3), Python Scripting (L2), ETRM Energy Trading and Risk Management (L4), Business Analysis (L3), Project Management ADM (L3), Allegro (L4), Quality Assurance (L3), Azure DevOps Operations (L3)
Job Role: Domain Consultant CETRM-ALLEGRO

As a Domain Consultant CETRM-ALLEGRO, you will be responsible for utilizing expertise in ETRM Energy Trading and Risk Management (ETRM) and Allegro to provide consulting services to clients in the energy trading industry. You will apply advanced knowledge of .NET and Python Scripting to analyze business requirements, manage projects, and ensure quality assurance in energy trading and risk management systems.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in ETRM Energy Trading and Risk Management (ETRM) and Allegro to provide consulting services to clients in the energy trading industry.
Apply advanced knowledge of .NET and Python Scripting to analyze business requirements, manage projects, and ensure quality assurance in energy trading and risk management systems.
Demonstrate proficiency in Business Analysis and Project Management ADM to effectively analyze and manage energy trading projects.
Utilize Quality Assurance skills to ensure the reliability and accuracy of energy trading and risk management systems.
Apply Azure DevOps Operations to streamline and optimize energy trading operations.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in ETRM Energy Trading and Risk Management (ETRM) is essential for this role, with a strong focus on system implementation and optimization.
Advanced knowledge of .NET is highly desirable, with the ability to develop and maintain energy trading applications.
Familiarity with Python Scripting is beneficial, with the capacity to automate tasks and analyze data in energy trading systems.
Experience in Allegro is advantageous, with the ability to configure and customize the Allegro system for energy trading operations.
Proficiency in Azure DevOps Operations is preferred, with the capability to streamline energy trading processes.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 5 years of relevant experience in the energy trading and risk management industry.
Previous experience in implementing and optimizing ETRM systems is beneficial, with a focus on system integration and customization.
Demonstrated proficiency in ETRM Energy Trading and Risk Management (ETRM) and .NET through system implementation and maintenance.
Proven track record of applying Business Analysis and Project Management ADM in energy trading and risk management projects.




CLUSTER NAME :DEVELOPER AUTOMOTIVE SAFETY AND COMPLIANCE - L3
CLUSTER SKILLS : ASPICE (L2), Automotive Functional Safety (L2)
Job Role: Developer Automotive Safety and Compliance
The Developer Automotive Safety and Compliance will be responsible for ensuring the safety and compliance of automotive software and systems, utilizing expertise in ASPICE and Automotive Functional Safety.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in ASPICE and Automotive Functional Safety to ensure compliance with safety standards and regulations in automotive software development.
Apply advanced knowledge of Automotive Functional Safety to design and implement safety mechanisms in automotive systems.
Demonstrate proficiency in ASPICE to assess and improve the quality and efficiency of automotive software development processes.
Utilize Automotive Functional Safety principles to conduct safety analyses and risk assessments for automotive systems.
Apply ASPICE guidelines to ensure the traceability and documentation of safety-related requirements in automotive projects.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in ASPICE is essential for this role, with a strong focus on process improvement and compliance with automotive standards.
Advanced knowledge of Automotive Functional Safety is highly desirable, with the ability to design and implement safety mechanisms in automotive systems.
Familiarity with automotive software development processes and safety standards is beneficial, with the capacity to assess and improve safety-related activities.
Experience in conducting safety analyses and risk assessments for automotive systems is advantageous, with the ability to ensure compliance with safety regulations.
Proficiency in traceability and documentation of safety-related requirements is preferred, with the capability to maintain compliance with industry standards.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 5 years of relevant experience in automotive software development and safety compliance.
Previous experience in designing and implementing safety mechanisms in automotive systems is beneficial, with a focus on ensuring compliance with safety standards.
Demonstrated proficiency in ASPICE and Automotive Functional Safety through experience in automotive software development.
Proven track record of applying safety analyses and risk assessments in automotive projects.




CLUSTER NAME :CYBER SECURITY ANALYST ACCESS MANAGEMENT OKTA - L1
CLUSTER SKILLS : PKI - Certificate Management (L1), OKTA - Identity and Access Management (L1), Multi Factor Authentication (MFA) (L1)
Job Role: Cyber Security Analyst - Access Management

Brief Summary: The Cyber Security Analyst - Access Management is responsible for ensuring the security of an organization's systems and data by managing user access, implementing identity and access management solutions, and maintaining multi-factor authentication protocols.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in PKI - Certificate Management (L1) and Cyber Security Analyst - Access Management to manage and maintain digital certificates for secure communication.
Apply advanced knowledge of OKTA - Identity and Access Management (L1) to implement and manage identity and access solutions for users and applications.
Demonstrate proficiency in Multi Factor Authentication (MFA) (L1) to enforce multi-factor authentication protocols for enhanced security.
Utilize Cyber Security Analyst - Access Management to monitor and manage user access permissions and privileges.
Apply OKTA - Identity and Access Management (L1) to integrate and manage access controls for cloud and on-premises applications.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in PKI - Certificate Management (L1) is essential for this role, with a strong focus on managing digital certificates and encryption.
Advanced knowledge of OKTA - Identity and Access Management (L1) is highly desirable, with the ability to implement and manage identity and access solutions.
Familiarity with Multi Factor Authentication (MFA) (L1) is beneficial, with the capacity to enforce multi-factor authentication protocols.
Experience in Cyber Security Analyst - Access Management is advantageous, with the ability to monitor and manage user access permissions.
Proficiency in OKTA - Identity and Access Management (L1) is preferred, with the capability to integrate and manage access controls for applications.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 2 years of relevant experience in Cyber Security or Access Management.
Previous experience in implementing identity and access solutions is beneficial, with a focus on managing user access.
Demonstrated proficiency in PKI - Certificate Management (L1) and OKTA - Identity and Access Management (L1) through previous roles.
Proven track record of applying Multi Factor Authentication (MFA) (L1) and Cyber Security Analyst - Access Management in previous experience.




CLUSTER NAME :Solution Architect ITOM  - BroadCom - L1
CLUSTER SKILLS : Windows Server Admin (L1), Unix Admin (L1), Consulting (L2), Kubernetes Containerization Integration (L1), CA Monitoring (L4), Cloud Engineering Private Cloud (L1), Broadcom DX NetOps (L4), Broadcom DX OI (L4), Broadcom DX UIM (L4)
Job Role: Solution Architect ITOM - BroadCom
A Solution Architect ITOM - BroadCom is responsible for utilizing expertise in Windows Server Admin (L1), Unix Admin (L1), Consulting (L2), Kubernetes Containerization Integration (L1), CA Monitoring (L4), Cloud Engineering Private Cloud (L1), Broadcom DX NetOps (L4), Broadcom DX OI (L4), Broadcom DX UIM (L4) to design and implement IT Operations Management solutions using BroadCom products.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in Windows Server Admin (L1) and Unix Admin (L1) to manage and maintain server infrastructure.
Apply advanced knowledge of Consulting (L2) to provide expert advice and guidance on IT operations management.
Demonstrate proficiency in Kubernetes Containerization Integration (L1) to integrate containerization technologies into IT operations.
Utilize CA Monitoring (L4) to monitor and analyze the performance of IT infrastructure and applications.
Apply Cloud Engineering Private Cloud (L1) to design and implement private cloud solutions for IT operations.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in Windows Server Admin (L1) is essential for this role, with a strong focus on server management and maintenance.
Advanced knowledge of Consulting (L2) is highly desirable, with the ability to provide expert advice and guidance.
Familiarity with Kubernetes Containerization Integration (L1) is beneficial, with the capacity to integrate containerization technologies.
Experience in CA Monitoring (L4) is advantageous, with the ability to monitor and analyze IT infrastructure and applications.
Proficiency in Cloud Engineering Private Cloud (L1) is preferred, with the capability to design and implement private cloud solutions.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 3 years of relevant experience in IT operations management.
Previous experience in consulting is beneficial, with a focus on providing expert guidance.
Demonstrated proficiency in Windows Server Admin (L1) and Unix Admin (L1) through hands-on experience.
Proven track record of applying CA Monitoring (L4) and Cloud Engineering Private Cloud (L1) in IT operations management.




CLUSTER NAME :DEVELOPER CONTENTFUL CAMPAIGN - L1
CLUSTER SKILLS : Java-J2EE (L1), Spring Boot (L1), Microservices (L1), Product Content Management (L1)
Job Role: Developer Contentful Campaign

Brief Summary: The Developer Contentful Campaign will be responsible for utilizing expertise in Java-J2EE, Spring Boot, Microservices, and Product Content Management to develop and manage content for marketing campaigns.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in Java-J2EE and Developer Contentful Campaign to develop and manage content for marketing campaigns.
Apply advanced knowledge of Spring Boot to enhance the performance and efficiency of content management systems.
Demonstrate proficiency in Microservices to design and implement scalable and modular content solutions.
Utilize Product Content Management to ensure the accuracy and consistency of content across various marketing channels.
Apply Java-J2EE, Spring Boot, and Microservices to integrate and optimize content delivery for marketing campaigns.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in Java-J2EE is essential for this role, with a strong focus on developing and managing content for marketing campaigns.
Advanced knowledge of Spring Boot is highly desirable, with the ability to enhance the performance and efficiency of content management systems.
Familiarity with Microservices is beneficial, with the capacity to design and implement scalable and modular content solutions.
Experience in Product Content Management is advantageous, with the ability to ensure the accuracy and consistency of content across various marketing channels.
Proficiency in Developer Contentful Campaign is preferred, with the capability to effectively utilize the platform for content management.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 2 years of relevant experience in software development and content management.
Previous experience in developing and managing content for marketing campaigns is beneficial, with a focus on utilizing Java-J2EE and Spring Boot.
Demonstrated proficiency in Microservices and Product Content Management through previous content management roles.
Proven track record of applying Java-J2EE and Spring Boot in optimizing content delivery for marketing campaigns.




CLUSTER NAME :DEVELOPER BLUEYONDER- DEMAND & FULFILLMENT PLANNING - L1
CLUSTER SKILLS : PL-SQL (L1), BY Supply Chain- Demand management (L1), BY Supply Chain - Fulfilment Management (L1)
Job Role: Developer BlueYonder- Demand & Fulfillment Planning

Brief Summary: The Developer BlueYonder- Demand & Fulfillment Planning will be responsible for utilizing expertise in PL-SQL and BlueYonder Supply Chain Management to develop and maintain demand and fulfillment planning solutions.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in PL-SQL and BlueYonder Supply Chain Management to develop and maintain demand and fulfillment planning solutions.
Apply advanced knowledge of BlueYonder Supply Chain - Demand management to optimize demand forecasting and planning processes.
Demonstrate proficiency in BlueYonder Supply Chain - Fulfillment Management to streamline order fulfillment and inventory management.
Utilize Developer skills to customize and enhance BlueYonder Demand & Fulfillment Planning solutions.
Apply PL-SQL to develop and maintain database solutions for demand and fulfillment planning.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in PL-SQL is essential for this role, with a strong focus on database development and management.
Advanced knowledge of BlueYonder Supply Chain - Demand management is highly desirable, with the ability to optimize demand forecasting processes.
Familiarity with BlueYonder Supply Chain - Fulfillment Management is beneficial, with the capacity to streamline order fulfillment processes.
Experience in Developer skills is advantageous, with the ability to customize and enhance planning solutions.
Proficiency in BY Supply Chain - Demand management is preferred, with the capability to optimize demand planning processes.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 2 years of relevant experience in Supply Chain Management or Software Development.
Previous experience in BlueYonder Demand & Fulfillment Planning is beneficial, with a focus on customizing planning solutions.
Demonstrated proficiency in PL-SQL and BlueYonder Supply Chain - Demand management through previous development projects.
Proven track record of applying BlueYonder Supply Chain - Fulfillment Management in optimizing order fulfillment processes.




CLUSTER NAME :TEST ENGINEER AI - PRODUCT SOFTWARE TESTING - L3
CLUSTER SKILLS : Artifical Intelligence Testing (L3), AI/ML App Testing (L3), AI Model testing (L3), AI for Product Software Engineering (L2), AI Augmented Product Testing (L3)
Job Role: Test Engineer AI - Product Software Testing
This role involves utilizing expertise in AI testing and product software engineering to ensure the quality and reliability of AI/ML applications and models.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in Artificial Intelligence Testing and AI for Product Software Engineering to ensure the quality and reliability of AI/ML applications.
Apply advanced knowledge of AI/ML App Testing to validate the functionality and performance of AI/ML applications.
Demonstrate proficiency in AI Model testing to ensure the accuracy and effectiveness of AI models.
Utilize AI Augmented Product Testing to enhance the quality and performance of AI-integrated products.
Apply AI testing techniques to ensure the robustness and reliability of AI-powered software products.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in Artificial Intelligence Testing is essential for this role, with a strong focus on validating AI/ML applications and models.
Advanced knowledge of AI/ML App Testing is highly desirable, with the ability to validate the functionality and performance of AI/ML applications.
Familiarity with AI Model testing is beneficial, with the capacity to ensure the accuracy and effectiveness of AI models.
Experience in AI for Product Software Engineering is advantageous, with the ability to ensure the quality and reliability of AI-integrated products.
Proficiency in AI Augmented Product Testing is preferred, with the capability to enhance the quality and performance of AI-powered software products.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 3 years of relevant experience in AI testing and product software engineering.
Previous experience in AI Model testing is beneficial, with a focus on ensuring the accuracy and effectiveness of AI models.
Demonstrated proficiency in Artificial Intelligence Testing and AI/ML App Testing through previous testing experience.
Proven track record of applying AI for Product Software Engineering and AI Augmented Product Testing in software testing environments.




CLUSTER NAME :TEST LEAD APPLICATION TESTING - L1
CLUSTER SKILLS : Application Testing (L3), JIRA (L3), Application Lifecycle Management - ALM (L3), Project Delivery (L2), Consulting(Automation) (L3)
Job Role: Test Lead Application Testing

Brief Summary: The Test Lead Application Testing is responsible for leading and managing the testing activities for applications, ensuring the quality and reliability of the software deliverables.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in Application Testing and Test Lead Application Testing to lead and manage the testing activities for applications.
Apply advanced knowledge of JIRA to effectively track and manage testing activities and issues.
Demonstrate proficiency in Application Lifecycle Management - ALM to ensure efficient management of the application testing lifecycle.
Utilize Project Delivery skills to ensure timely and successful delivery of testing activities.
Apply Consulting (Automation) expertise to drive automation initiatives and improve testing efficiency.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in Application Testing is essential for this role, with a strong focus on ensuring comprehensive test coverage and defect identification.
Advanced knowledge of JIRA is highly desirable, with the ability to effectively manage testing activities and track issues.
Familiarity with Application Lifecycle Management - ALM is beneficial, with the capacity to efficiently manage testing processes and resources.
Experience in Project Delivery is advantageous, with the ability to ensure timely and successful delivery of testing activities.
Proficiency in Consulting (Automation) is preferred, with the capability to drive automation initiatives and improve testing efficiency.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 5 years of relevant experience in Application Testing.
Previous experience in test lead roles is beneficial, with a focus on leading testing activities and teams.
Demonstrated proficiency in Application Testing and JIRA through previous testing roles.
Proven track record of applying Application Lifecycle Management - ALM and Project Delivery in testing activities.




CLUSTER NAME :Designit Test Engineer L4
CLUSTER SKILLS : Mobile handset device testing (L3), Scalability Testing (L2), Performance Test Engineering (L2), Artifical Intelligence Testing (L3), AI/ML App Testing (L3), Designit Designer (L3), Playwright (L2)
Job Role: Designit Test Engineer

Brief Summary: The Designit Test Engineer will be responsible for utilizing expertise in mobile handset device testing, scalability testing, performance test engineering, artificial intelligence testing, AI/ML app testing, Designit Designer, and Playwright to ensure the quality and reliability of software products.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in mobile handset device testing and Designit Test Engineer to ensure the quality and reliability of software products.
Apply advanced knowledge of scalability testing to assess the performance and scalability of software applications.
Demonstrate proficiency in performance test engineering to optimize the performance of software products.
Utilize artificial intelligence testing to ensure the accuracy and effectiveness of AI-based software solutions.
Apply Playwright for automated testing of web applications.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in mobile handset device testing is essential for this role, with a strong focus on ensuring the functionality and compatibility of software on mobile devices.
Advanced knowledge of scalability testing is highly desirable, with the ability to assess the performance and scalability of software applications under varying loads.
Familiarity with performance test engineering is beneficial, with the capacity to optimize the performance of software products under different conditions.
Experience in artificial intelligence testing is advantageous, with the ability to ensure the accuracy and effectiveness of AI-based software solutions.
Proficiency in Playwright is preferred, with the capability to conduct automated testing of web applications.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 5 years of relevant experience in software testing and quality assurance.
Previous experience in AI/ML app testing is beneficial, with a focus on ensuring the reliability and accuracy of AI/ML applications.
Demonstrated proficiency in mobile handset device testing and scalability testing through previous testing roles.
Proven track record of applying performance test engineering and artificial intelligence testing in software testing and quality assurance.




CLUSTER NAME :Designit CXP and Crisis Management Lead L4
CLUSTER SKILLS : Cloud-Microsoft Azure (L4), Leadership (L4), Data Visualization (L4), Critical Incident Response (L4)
Job Role: Designit CXP and Crisis Management Lead

Brief Summary: The Designit CXP and Crisis Management Lead will be responsible for utilizing expertise in Cloud-Microsoft Azure and Leadership to lead and manage critical incident response and crisis management. They will also be responsible for utilizing advanced knowledge of Data Visualization to drive effective decision-making and problem-solving.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in Cloud-Microsoft Azure and Leadership to lead and manage critical incident response and crisis management.
Apply advanced knowledge of Data Visualization to drive effective decision-making and problem-solving.
Demonstrate proficiency in Critical Incident Response to effectively handle and resolve critical incidents.
Utilize Data Visualization to present complex data in a clear and understandable manner.
Apply Leadership skills to lead and mentor the crisis management team.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in Cloud-Microsoft Azure is essential for this role, with a strong focus on managing critical incidents and crisis management.
Advanced knowledge of Leadership is highly desirable, with the ability to lead and mentor the crisis management team effectively.
Familiarity with Data Visualization is beneficial, with the capacity to present complex data in a clear and understandable manner.
Experience in Critical Incident Response is advantageous, with the ability to effectively handle and resolve critical incidents.
Proficiency in Cloud-Microsoft Azure is preferred, with the capability to lead and manage critical incident response.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 5 years of relevant experience in crisis management and incident response.
Previous experience in leading crisis management teams is beneficial, with a focus on effectively utilizing Cloud-Microsoft Azure and Leadership skills.
Demonstrated proficiency in Cloud-Microsoft Azure and Leadership through leading crisis management teams.
Proven track record of applying Data Visualization and Critical Incident Response in crisis management scenarios.




CLUSTER NAME :TECHNO FUNCTIONAL CONSULTANT ADOBE AEM WEB - L2
CLUSTER SKILLS : Java-J2EE (L3), eCommerce DevOps (L2), Adobe AEM (L4), Digital Marketing Consulting (L2), React JS (L1), Adobe Launch and Analytics (L1)
Job Role: Techno Functional Consultant Adobe AEM Web

Brief Summary: The Techno Functional Consultant Adobe AEM Web will be responsible for utilizing expertise in Adobe AEM to provide technical and functional consulting for web development projects.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in Adobe AEM and Techno Functional Consultant Adobe AEM Web to provide technical and functional consulting for web development projects.
Apply advanced knowledge of eCommerce DevOps to streamline the development and operations of web applications.
Demonstrate proficiency in Adobe Launch and Analytics to track and analyze the performance of web applications.
Utilize Java-J2EE to develop and maintain web applications.
Apply React JS to enhance the user interface and experience of web applications.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in Adobe AEM is essential for this role, with a strong focus on providing technical and functional consulting for web development projects.
Advanced knowledge of eCommerce DevOps is highly desirable, with the ability to streamline the development and operations of web applications.
Familiarity with Adobe Launch and Analytics is beneficial, with the capacity to track and analyze the performance of web applications.
Experience in Java-J2EE is advantageous, with the ability to develop and maintain web applications.
Proficiency in React JS is preferred, with the capability to enhance the user interface and experience of web applications.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 3 years of relevant experience in web development and Adobe AEM.
Previous experience in digital marketing consulting is beneficial, with a focus on providing technical and functional consulting for web development projects.
Demonstrated proficiency in Adobe AEM and eCommerce DevOps through previous consulting or development experience.
Proven track record of applying Adobe Launch and Analytics and Java-J2EE in web development projects.




CLUSTER NAME :CYBER DEFENCE MANAGER L1
CLUSTER SKILLS : Enterprise Architecting (L2), Security Compliance and Framework (L2), Vulnerability Management (L2), Security Audits (L2), Business Continuity (L3), Information Security Management System (L2), Disaster Recovery Testing (L2), Program Governance (L3)
Job Role: Cyber Defence Manager
The Cyber Defence Manager is responsible for overseeing and managing the organization's cyber defence strategies and operations. They are tasked with ensuring the security and integrity of the organization's digital assets and infrastructure.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in Enterprise Architecting (L2) and Cyber Defence Manager to develop and implement robust cyber defence strategies.
Apply advanced knowledge of Security Compliance and Framework (L2) to ensure adherence to industry standards and regulations.
Demonstrate proficiency in Business Continuity (L3) to develop and maintain plans for continuous operations in the event of a cyber attack.
Utilize Vulnerability Management (L2) to identify and mitigate potential security vulnerabilities within the organization.
Apply Security Audits (L2) to conduct regular assessments of the organization's security posture.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in Enterprise Architecting (L2) is essential for this role, with a strong focus on designing secure and scalable IT infrastructures.
Advanced knowledge of Security Compliance and Framework (L2) is highly desirable, with the ability to ensure compliance with security standards and regulations.
Familiarity with Business Continuity (L3) is beneficial, with the capacity to develop and maintain business continuity plans.
Experience in Vulnerability Management (L2) is advantageous, with the ability to identify and address potential security weaknesses.
Proficiency in Security Audits (L2) is preferred, with the capability to conduct thorough security assessments.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 5 years of relevant experience in the field of cyber security.
Previous experience in managing cyber defence operations is beneficial, with a focus on implementing security measures.
Demonstrated proficiency in Enterprise Architecting (L2) and Security Compliance and Framework (L2) through previous experience.
Proven track record of applying Business Continuity (L3) and Vulnerability Management (L2) in previous cyber security roles.




CLUSTER NAME :DOMAIN CONSULTANT CORE BANKING FUNCTIONAL - L1
CLUSTER SKILLS : Core Banking (L1), Business Analysis (L1), Corporate Banking Finance and Lending (L1)
Job Role: Domain Consultant Core Banking Functional

Brief Summary: The Domain Consultant Core Banking Functional will be responsible for utilizing expertise in core banking, business analysis, and corporate banking finance and lending to provide functional support and guidance in the banking domain.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in Core Banking and Business Analysis to provide functional support and guidance in the banking domain.
Apply advanced knowledge of Corporate Banking Finance and Lending to analyze and improve banking processes.
Demonstrate proficiency in Business Analysis to identify and address banking business needs.
Utilize Core Banking to support and enhance banking operations.
Apply Business Analysis to gather and analyze banking requirements.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in Core Banking is essential for this role, with a strong focus on functional support and guidance in the banking domain.
Advanced knowledge of Business Analysis is highly desirable, with the ability to analyze and improve banking processes.
Familiarity with Corporate Banking Finance and Lending is beneficial, with the capacity to understand and address banking business needs.
Experience in Core Banking is advantageous, with the ability to support and enhance banking operations.
Proficiency in Business Analysis is preferred, with the capability to gather and analyze banking requirements.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 3 years of relevant experience in the banking industry.
Previous experience in functional support and guidance in banking is beneficial, with a focus on relevant proficiency.
Demonstrated proficiency in Core Banking and Business Analysis through previous experience.
Proven track record of applying Corporate Banking Finance and Lending and Business Analysis in banking operations.




CLUSTER NAME :TECHNO FUNCTIONAL CONSULTANT ADOBE DTM LAUNCH CAMPAIGN - L2
CLUSTER SKILLS : JavaScript (L3), eCommerce DevOps (L1), jQuery (L3), Digital Marketing Consulting (L2), Adobe Campaign (L2), Adobe Launch and Analytics (L4), Angular 15 (L2)
Job Role: Techno Functional Consultant Adobe DTM Launch Campaign

Brief Summary: The Techno Functional Consultant Adobe DTM Launch Campaign will be responsible for utilizing expertise in Adobe Launch and Analytics to implement and optimize digital marketing campaigns. They will apply advanced knowledge of JavaScript and jQuery to develop and maintain eCommerce DevOps solutions, while also providing consulting services for Adobe Campaign.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in JavaScript and Adobe Launch and Analytics to implement and optimize digital marketing campaigns.
Apply advanced knowledge of jQuery to develop and maintain eCommerce DevOps solutions.
Demonstrate proficiency in Digital Marketing Consulting to provide strategic guidance for Adobe Campaign.
Utilize eCommerce DevOps to support the implementation and maintenance of digital marketing solutions.
Apply Adobe Campaign to design and execute targeted marketing campaigns.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in JavaScript is essential for this role, with a strong focus on digital marketing campaign implementation.
Advanced knowledge of jQuery is highly desirable, with the ability to develop and maintain eCommerce DevOps solutions.
Familiarity with Digital Marketing Consulting is beneficial, with the capacity to provide strategic guidance for Adobe Campaign.
Experience in eCommerce DevOps is advantageous, with the ability to support the implementation and maintenance of digital marketing solutions.
Proficiency in Adobe Campaign is preferred, with the capability to design and execute targeted marketing campaigns.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 3 years of relevant experience in digital marketing and eCommerce.
Previous experience in digital marketing consulting is beneficial, with a focus on providing strategic guidance for Adobe Campaign.
Demonstrated proficiency in JavaScript and jQuery through previous digital marketing and eCommerce DevOps experience.
Proven track record of applying Adobe Campaign and eCommerce DevOps in digital marketing campaign execution.




CLUSTER NAME :TEST AUTOMATION CONSULTANT TOSCA - L4
CLUSTER SKILLS : Tosca Testsuite - Test Automation (L3), Application Test Consulting (L4), Qtest (L2)
Job Role: Test Automation Consultant Tosca
As a Test Automation Consultant Tosca, you will be responsible for utilizing expertise in Tosca Testsuite - Test Automation to provide application test consulting. You will apply advanced knowledge of Qtest to ensure efficient and effective test automation processes.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in Tosca Testsuite - Test Automation and Test Automation Consultant Tosca to provide application test consulting.
Apply advanced knowledge of Application Test Consulting to ensure efficient and effective test automation processes.
Demonstrate proficiency in Qtest to streamline the test management process.
Utilize Test Automation skills to develop and maintain automated test scripts.
Apply Tosca Testsuite - Test Automation to conduct comprehensive test case design and execution.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in Tosca Testsuite - Test Automation is essential for this role, with a strong focus on test automation best practices.
Advanced knowledge of Application Test Consulting is highly desirable, with the ability to provide strategic test automation solutions.
Familiarity with Qtest is beneficial, with the capacity to effectively manage test cases and defects.
Experience in Test Automation is advantageous, with the ability to develop and maintain automated test scripts.
Proficiency in Tosca Testsuite - Test Automation is preferred, with the capability to conduct comprehensive test case design and execution.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 5 years of relevant experience in Test Automation and Application Test Consulting.
Previous experience in strategic test automation consulting is beneficial, with a focus on implementing efficient test automation frameworks.
Demonstrated proficiency in Tosca Testsuite - Test Automation and Application Test Consulting through successful project implementations.
Proven track record of applying Qtest and Test Automation skills in streamlining test management processes.




CLUSTER NAME :SOLUTION ARCHITECT MICROSOFT POWER PLATFORM - L3
CLUSTER SKILLS : Architecting (L3), Microsoft PowerApps (L3), Microsoft Power Platform (L3), Microsoft Power Automate (L3)
Job Role: Solution Architect Microsoft Power Platform - L3
Brief Summary: The Solution Architect Microsoft Power Platform - L3 will be responsible for utilizing expertise in Microsoft Power Platform to architect solutions and provide advanced knowledge in Microsoft PowerApps, Power Platform, and Power Automate.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in Microsoft Power Platform to architect solutions.
Apply advanced knowledge of Microsoft PowerApps to develop efficient applications.
Demonstrate proficiency in Microsoft Power Automate to automate business processes.
Utilize Microsoft Power Platform to integrate data and create insightful dashboards.
Apply Microsoft PowerApps to customize and extend applications as per business requirements.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in Microsoft Power Platform is essential for this role, with a strong focus on solution architecture.
Advanced knowledge of Microsoft PowerApps is highly desirable, with the ability to develop efficient applications.
Familiarity with Microsoft Power Automate is beneficial, with the capacity to automate business processes.
Experience in architecting solutions using Microsoft Power Platform is advantageous, with the ability to integrate data and create insightful dashboards.
Proficiency in Microsoft PowerApps is preferred, with the capability to customize and extend applications.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 5 years of relevant experience in solution architecture and Microsoft Power Platform.
Previous experience in architecting solutions using Microsoft Power Platform is beneficial, with a focus on integrating data and creating insightful dashboards.
Demonstrated proficiency in Microsoft Power Platform and PowerApps through solution architecture experience.
Proven track record of applying Microsoft Power Automate and Microsoft Power Platform in solution architecture.




CLUSTER NAME :DATA ANALYST CONGA CPQ - CLM - L3
CLUSTER SKILLS : Salesforce Platform Development (L2), Salesforce App Building (L2), Salesforce Administration (L2), Salesforce Data Migration (L1), Conga Composer (L1), CONGA X-Author (L1), CONGA CPQ (L2), CONGA CLM (L2)
Job Role: Salesforce Data Analyst

Brief Summary: The Salesforce Data Analyst will be responsible for utilizing expertise in Salesforce Platform Development, App Building, and Administration to analyze and manage data within the Salesforce platform. They will also be involved in data migration and utilizing Conga Composer, CONGA X-Author, CONGA CPQ, and CONGA CLM for data analysis and reporting.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in Salesforce Platform Development and App Building to analyze and manage data within the Salesforce platform.
Apply advanced knowledge of Salesforce Administration to ensure efficient data management and system configuration.
Demonstrate proficiency in Salesforce Data Migration to transfer and maintain data integrity within the Salesforce platform.
Utilize Conga Composer, CONGA X-Author, CONGA CPQ, and CONGA CLM for data analysis, reporting, and document generation.
Apply data analysis skills to derive insights and make data-driven recommendations for business decisions.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in Salesforce Platform Development is essential for this role, with a strong focus on data management and customization.
Advanced knowledge of Salesforce App Building is highly desirable, with the ability to create custom applications and user interfaces.
Familiarity with Salesforce Administration is beneficial, with the capacity to configure and maintain the Salesforce platform.
Experience in Salesforce Data Migration is advantageous, with the ability to transfer and maintain data integrity.
Proficiency in Conga Composer, CONGA X-Author, CONGA CPQ, and CONGA CLM is preferred, with the capability to generate reports and analyze data.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 3-5 years of relevant experience in Salesforce platform development and data analysis.
Previous experience in Salesforce data migration and CONGA CPQ/CLM is beneficial, with a focus on data analysis and reporting.
Demonstrated proficiency in Salesforce Platform Development and App Building through previous project experience.
Proven track record of applying data analysis and CONGA CPQ/CLM in Salesforce platform development and administration.




CLUSTER NAME :DEVELOPER AWS CLOUD PRODUCT ENGINEERING .NET BACK END - L3
CLUSTER SKILLS : C# - CSharp-Programming (L3), C# - CSharp-Programming (L3), C# - CSharp-Programming (L3), C# - CSharp-Programming (L3), .NET (L3), .NET (L3), .NET (L3), .NET (L3), NoSQL Database (L3), NoSQL Database (L3), NoSQL Database (L3), NoSQL Database (L3), Microservices (L3), Microservices (L3), Microservices (L3), Microservices (L3), Cloud Engineering AWS (L3), Cloud Engineering AWS (L3), Cloud Engineering AWS (L3), Cloud Engineering AWS (L3), Enterprise Platform Devops Tools (L3), Enterprise Platform Devops Tools (L3), Enterprise Platform Devops Tools (L3), Enterprise Platform Devops Tools (L3)
Job Role: AWS Cloud Product Engineering .NET Back End Developer
Brief Summary: The AWS Cloud Product Engineering .NET Back End Developer will be responsible for utilizing expertise in C# - CSharp-Programming and .NET to develop and maintain back-end applications on the AWS cloud platform.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in C# - CSharp-Programming and .NET to develop and maintain back-end applications on the AWS cloud platform.
Apply advanced knowledge of NoSQL Database to design and implement efficient data storage solutions for back-end applications.
Demonstrate proficiency in Microservices to architect and develop scalable and modular back-end systems.
Utilize Cloud Engineering AWS to deploy, monitor, and maintain back-end applications on the AWS cloud platform.
Apply Enterprise Platform Devops Tools to automate and streamline the development, testing, and deployment processes for back-end applications.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in C# - CSharp-Programming is essential for this role, with a strong focus on back-end development.
Advanced knowledge of .NET is highly desirable, with the ability to design and implement efficient back-end solutions.
Familiarity with NoSQL Database is beneficial, with the capacity to design and optimize data storage for back-end applications.
Experience in Microservices is advantageous, with the ability to architect and develop scalable back-end systems.
Proficiency in Cloud Engineering AWS is preferred, with the capability to deploy and maintain back-end applications on the AWS cloud platform.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 5 years of relevant experience in back-end development and AWS cloud platform.
Previous experience in developing and maintaining back-end applications is beneficial, with a focus on AWS cloud proficiency.
Demonstrated proficiency in C# - CSharp-Programming and .NET through previous back-end development experience.
Proven track record of applying NoSQL Database and Microservices in developing scalable back-end systems.




CLUSTER NAME :TECHNO FUNCTIONAL CONSULTANT PORTAL FULL STACK WEB - L1
CLUSTER SKILLS : Java-J2EE (L3), eCommerce DevOps (L1), Portal Architecture (L4), Digital Marketing Consulting (L1), Spring Boot (L2), React JS (L2), Microservices (L2), AWS Amplify (L1)
Job Role: 
Technical Functional Consultant Portal Full Stack Web

Brief Summary:
The Technical Functional Consultant Portal Full Stack Web will be responsible for utilizing expertise in Portal Architecture and Full Stack Web Development to design and implement technical solutions for web portals.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in Portal Architecture and Full Stack Web Development to design and implement technical solutions for web portals.
Apply advanced knowledge of Java-J2EE to develop and maintain web portal functionalities.
Demonstrate proficiency in Spring Boot and React JS to create responsive and interactive user interfaces.
Utilize eCommerce DevOps to ensure seamless integration and deployment of web portal features.
Apply AWS Amplify to optimize web portal performance and scalability.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in Portal Architecture is essential for this role, with a strong focus on designing scalable and secure web portals.
Advanced knowledge of Java-J2EE is highly desirable, with the ability to develop and maintain complex web portal functionalities.
Familiarity with Spring Boot and React JS is beneficial, with the capacity to create responsive and interactive user interfaces.
Experience in eCommerce DevOps is advantageous, with the ability to ensure seamless integration and deployment of web portal features.
Proficiency in AWS Amplify is preferred, with the capability to optimize web portal performance and scalability.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 5 years of relevant experience in web portal development and implementation.
Previous experience in Full Stack Web Development is beneficial, with a focus on designing and implementing scalable web solutions.
Demonstrated proficiency in Portal Architecture and Java-J2EE through previous web portal development projects.
Proven track record of applying Spring Boot and React JS in creating user-friendly web interfaces.




CLUSTER NAME :SENIOR MID LEVEL MANAGER US RETIREMENT - DEFINED BENEFITS - L3
CLUSTER SKILLS : Leadership (L4), Defined Benefit (DB) (L4), Defined Benefit (DB) Tech (L4)
Job Role: Senior Mid Level Manager US Retirement - Defined Benefits

Brief Summary: The Senior Mid Level Manager US Retirement - Defined Benefits will be responsible for utilizing expertise in Leadership, Defined Benefit (DB) and Defined Benefit (DB) Tech to oversee and manage the defined benefits retirement plans for clients in the US.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in Leadership and Defined Benefit (DB) Tech to strategize and manage the defined benefits retirement plans.
Apply advanced knowledge of Defined Benefit (DB) to ensure compliance and accuracy in the administration of retirement plans.
Demonstrate proficiency in Defined Benefit (DB) Tech to implement technological solutions for efficient plan management.
Utilize Leadership skills to lead and mentor a team for successful execution of retirement plan services.
Apply Defined Benefit (DB) knowledge to analyze and optimize retirement plan performance.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in Leadership is essential for this role, with a strong focus on strategic planning and team management.
Advanced knowledge of Defined Benefit (DB) is highly desirable, with the ability to ensure compliance and accuracy in plan administration.
Familiarity with Defined Benefit (DB) Tech is beneficial, with the capacity to implement technological solutions for plan management.
Experience in US Retirement is advantageous, with the ability to oversee and manage defined benefits retirement plans.
Proficiency in Defined Benefit (DB) Tech is preferred, with the capability to implement technological solutions for efficient plan management.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 5 years of relevant experience in US Retirement - Defined Benefits.
Previous experience in overseeing and managing defined benefits retirement plans is beneficial, with a focus on compliance and accuracy.
Demonstrated proficiency in Leadership and Defined Benefit (DB) through strategic planning and plan administration.
Proven track record of applying Defined Benefit (DB) Tech and Defined Benefit (DB) in optimizing retirement plan performance.




CLUSTER NAME :DEVELOPER .NET CORE - L3
CLUSTER SKILLS : C# - CSharp-Programming (L3), ADO.NET Entity Framework (L3), NUNIT (L3), DevOps - Continuous Delivery (L3), ASP.NET Web API (L3), Docker Platform (L3), ASP.NET Core (L3), .NET TDD (L3)
Job Role: .NET Core Developer
Brief Summary: The .NET Core Developer will be responsible for utilizing expertise in C# programming and .NET Core to develop and maintain software applications. They will apply advanced knowledge of ADO.NET Entity Framework and NUNIT for testing and continuous delivery using DevOps practices.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in C# - CSharp-Programming and .NET Core to develop and maintain software applications.
Apply advanced knowledge of ADO.NET Entity Framework for database access and NUNIT for testing.
Demonstrate proficiency in DevOps - Continuous Delivery for efficient software deployment.
Utilize ASP.NET Web API for building and consuming HTTP services.
Apply Docker Platform for containerization and ASP.NET Core for building modern web applications.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in C# - CSharp-Programming is essential for this role, with a strong focus on software development.
Advanced knowledge of ADO.NET Entity Framework is highly desirable, with the ability to access and manipulate data.
Familiarity with NUNIT is beneficial, with the capacity to write and execute unit tests.
Experience in DevOps - Continuous Delivery is advantageous, with the ability to automate software delivery processes.
Proficiency in ASP.NET Web API is preferred, with the capability to build and consume HTTP services.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 5 years of relevant experience in software development.
Previous experience in .NET Core development is beneficial, with a focus on efficient coding practices.
Demonstrated proficiency in C# - CSharp-Programming and ADO.NET Entity Framework through previous software development experience.
Proven track record of applying DevOps - Continuous Delivery and ASP.NET Web API in software development projects.




CLUSTER NAME :Solution Architect ITOM  - SCOM - L2
CLUSTER SKILLS : Windows Server Admin (L1), Consulting (L3), Architecting (L1), MS System Center Operations Manager (L4), Kubernetes Containerization Integration (L1), Cloud Engineering Private Cloud (L1)
Job Role: Solution Architect ITOM - SCOM

Brief Summary: The Solution Architect ITOM - SCOM will be responsible for utilizing expertise in MS System Center Operations Manager (SCOM) and Windows Server Admin to architect and consult on solutions related to cloud engineering, Kubernetes containerization integration, and private cloud.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in MS System Center Operations Manager (SCOM) and Windows Server Admin to architect and consult on solutions related to cloud engineering, Kubernetes containerization integration, and private cloud.
Apply advanced knowledge of Consulting to provide expert guidance and recommendations on IT operations management solutions.
Demonstrate proficiency in Architecting to design and implement effective IT operations management solutions.
Utilize Kubernetes Containerization Integration to integrate containerized applications with IT operations management solutions.
Apply Cloud Engineering Private Cloud to design and implement private cloud solutions for IT operations management.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in MS System Center Operations Manager (SCOM) is essential for this role, with a strong focus on architecting and consulting on IT operations management solutions.
Advanced knowledge of Consulting is highly desirable, with the ability to provide expert guidance and recommendations on IT operations management solutions.
Familiarity with Architecting is beneficial, with the capacity to design and implement effective IT operations management solutions.
Experience in Windows Server Admin is advantageous, with the ability to manage and maintain Windows server environments.
Proficiency in Kubernetes Containerization Integration is preferred, with the capability to integrate containerized applications with IT operations management solutions.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 5 years of relevant experience in IT operations management.
Previous experience in consulting and architecting IT operations management solutions is beneficial, with a focus on providing expert guidance and recommendations.
Demonstrated proficiency in MS System Center Operations Manager (SCOM) and Consulting through previous experience.
Proven track record of applying Architecting and Windows Server Admin in IT operations management solutions.




CLUSTER NAME :GBL PRACTICE HR LEADER L3
CLUSTER SKILLS : Effective Communication (L4), Leadership (L1), Employee Relationship Management (L4), Performance Management (L3), Reward Strategy (L3), Succession Planning (L3), Diversity Strategy (L3)
Job Role: GBL Practice HR Leader

Brief Summary: The GBL Practice HR Leader will be responsible for leading and managing the HR function within the organization, with a focus on driving employee engagement, performance management, and diversity strategy.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in Employee Relationship Management and GBL Practice HR Leader to drive employee engagement and foster a positive work environment.
Apply advanced knowledge of Performance Management to develop and implement performance evaluation processes and strategies.
Demonstrate proficiency in Leadership to provide guidance and direction to the HR team and other departments.
Utilize Effective Communication to ensure clear and transparent communication across the organization.
Apply Reward Strategy to design and implement effective reward and recognition programs.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in Employee Relationship Management is essential for this role, with a strong focus on building and maintaining positive employee relations.
Advanced knowledge of Performance Management is highly desirable, with the ability to develop and implement performance improvement plans.
Familiarity with Leadership is beneficial, with the capacity to provide mentorship and guidance to the HR team.
Experience in Effective Communication is advantageous, with the ability to communicate effectively at all levels of the organization.
Proficiency in Reward Strategy is preferred, with the capability to design and implement effective reward programs.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 8 years of relevant experience in HR leadership roles.
Previous experience in driving diversity strategy is beneficial, with a focus on creating an inclusive work environment.
Demonstrated proficiency in Employee Relationship Management and Performance Management through previous HR leadership roles.
Proven track record of applying Effective Communication and Reward Strategy in HR leadership positions.




CLUSTER NAME :TECHNO FUNCTIONAL CONSULTANT GUIDEWIRE INTEGRATION - L1
CLUSTER SKILLS : Data Analysis (L1), Life Insurance (L1), Testing (L1), Guidewire Integration (L2), Insurance Products (L1)
Job Role: Technical Functional Consultant - Guidewire Integration

Brief Summary: The Technical Functional Consultant - Guidewire Integration will be responsible for utilizing expertise in Guidewire Integration to provide technical and functional support for insurance products and data analysis.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in Guidewire Integration to provide technical and functional support for insurance products.
Apply advanced knowledge of Data Analysis to analyze and interpret data related to insurance products.
Demonstrate proficiency in Testing to ensure the quality and reliability of Guidewire Integration.
Utilize Insurance Products knowledge to understand and support the specific requirements of the insurance industry.
Apply Guidewire Integration skills to integrate and optimize the Guidewire platform for insurance products.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in Guidewire Integration is essential for this role, with a strong focus on technical and functional support for insurance products.
Advanced knowledge of Data Analysis is highly desirable, with the ability to analyze and interpret data effectively.
Familiarity with Testing is beneficial, with the capacity to ensure the quality and reliability of Guidewire Integration.
Experience in Insurance Products is advantageous, with the ability to understand and support specific industry requirements.
Proficiency in Guidewire Integration is preferred, with the capability to integrate and optimize the Guidewire platform.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 2-3 years of relevant experience in the insurance industry.
Previous experience in Guidewire Integration is beneficial, with a focus on technical and functional proficiency.
Demonstrated proficiency in Guidewire Integration and Data Analysis through previous experience.
Proven track record of applying Testing and Insurance Products knowledge in the insurance industry.




CLUSTER NAME :DOMAIN CONSULTANT ACTIMIZE - L4
CLUSTER SKILLS : Actimize (L3), Institutional Compliance (L4)
Job Role: Domain Consultant Actimize

Brief Summary: As a Domain Consultant Actimize, you will be responsible for utilizing expertise in Actimize and Institutional Compliance to provide advanced consulting services in the field of financial crime and compliance.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in Actimize and Institutional Compliance to provide advanced consulting services.
Apply advanced knowledge of financial crime and compliance to develop and implement solutions.
Demonstrate proficiency in regulatory requirements and financial crime trends to advise clients.
Utilize Actimize platform to design and implement effective compliance solutions.
Apply industry best practices and standards to ensure effective financial crime prevention.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in Actimize is essential for this role, with a strong focus on financial crime and compliance.
Advanced knowledge of Institutional Compliance is highly desirable, with the ability to provide expert consulting services.
Familiarity with regulatory requirements is beneficial, with the capacity to advise clients on compliance.
Experience in Actimize platform is advantageous, with the ability to design and implement solutions.
Proficiency in industry best practices is preferred, with the capability to ensure effective financial crime prevention.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 5 years of relevant experience in financial crime and compliance.
Previous experience in providing expert consulting services in Actimize is beneficial, with a focus on compliance solutions.
Demonstrated proficiency in Actimize and Institutional Compliance through consulting experience.
Proven track record of applying regulatory requirements and industry best practices in compliance solutions.




CLUSTER NAME :PRODUCTION AGENT MEDIA - PAYMENT RISK AND FRAUD - L1
CLUSTER SKILLS : Customer Service(Product&Service) (L1), Payment and Fraud( Trust & Safety) (L1)
Job Role: Production Agent Media - Payment Risk and Fraud

Brief Summary: The Production Agent Media - Payment Risk and Fraud will be responsible for ensuring customer service related to product and service, as well as maintaining trust and safety in payment and fraud operations.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in Customer Service (Product & Service) and Payment and Fraud (Trust & Safety) to ensure complete and detailed responses to user queries.
Apply advanced knowledge of Payment and Fraud (Trust & Safety) to maintain trust and safety in payment operations.
Demonstrate proficiency in Customer Service (Product & Service) to provide complete and detailed customer support.
Utilize Payment and Fraud (Trust & Safety) to ensure security and safety in payment operations.
Apply Customer Service (Product & Service) to maintain high levels of customer satisfaction.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in Customer Service (Product & Service) is essential for this role, with a strong focus on providing complete and detailed customer support.
Advanced knowledge of Payment and Fraud (Trust & Safety) is highly desirable, with the ability to maintain trust and safety in payment operations.
Familiarity with Production Agent Media is beneficial, with the capacity to ensure security and safety in payment operations.
Experience in Payment and Fraud (Trust & Safety) is advantageous, with the ability to maintain trust and safety in payment operations.
Proficiency in Customer Service (Product & Service) is preferred, with the capability to maintain high levels of customer satisfaction.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 2 years of relevant experience in customer service and payment and fraud operations.
Previous experience in trust and safety operations is beneficial, with a focus on maintaining security and safety in payment operations.
Demonstrated proficiency in customer service and payment and fraud operations through previous work experience.
Proven track record of applying trust and safety measures in payment operations.




CLUSTER NAME :SOFTWARE QUALITY ASSURANCE CONSULTANT L3
CLUSTER SKILLS : ITIL Service Level Mgmt (L1), Influencing (L2), Planning and Organising (L1)
Job Role: Software Quality Assurance Consultant

Brief Summary: As a Software Quality Assurance Consultant, you will be responsible for ensuring the quality of software products and systems by utilizing expertise in ITIL Service Level Management, influencing, and planning and organizing.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in ITIL Service Level Management and Software Quality Assurance Consultant to ensure effective service level management processes.
Apply advanced knowledge of influencing to collaborate with cross-functional teams and stakeholders to drive quality improvements.
Demonstrate proficiency in planning and organizing to develop and implement quality assurance strategies and processes.
Utilize software quality assurance skills to conduct testing, identify defects, and ensure the delivery of high-quality software products.
Apply ITIL Service Level Management skills to monitor and maintain service levels and quality standards.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in ITIL Service Level Management is essential for this role, with a strong focus on effectively managing service levels.
Advanced knowledge of influencing is highly desirable, with the ability to effectively influence and drive quality improvements.
Familiarity with planning and organizing is beneficial, with the capacity to effectively plan and organize quality assurance activities.
Experience in software quality assurance is advantageous, with the ability to conduct testing and ensure software quality.
Proficiency in ITIL Service Level Management is preferred, with the capability to monitor and maintain service levels.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 5 years of relevant experience in software quality assurance.
Previous experience in quality assurance testing is beneficial, with a focus on ensuring high-quality software products.
Demonstrated proficiency in ITIL Service Level Management and influencing through previous experience.
Proven track record of applying planning and organizing skills in quality assurance activities.




CLUSTER NAME :CAD Engineer Design - L2
CLUSTER SKILLS : CADTools (L2), Detail design (L1), CAD Modeling (L2), Mechanical Product development (L2), Geometric dimensioning and tolerance (L1)
Job Role: CAD Engineer Design - L2
As a CAD Engineer Design - L2, you will be responsible for utilizing expertise in CADTools and CAD Modeling to contribute to the detail design and mechanical product development. You will also apply advanced knowledge of Geometric dimensioning and tolerance to ensure precision and accuracy in the design process.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in CADTools and CAD Engineer Design - L2 to contribute to the detail design and mechanical product development.
Apply advanced knowledge of CAD Modeling to create and modify 3D models of mechanical components and assemblies.
Demonstrate proficiency in Geometric dimensioning and tolerance to ensure accurate interpretation of design specifications.
Utilize Mechanical Product development skills to contribute to the overall product design process.
Apply CADTools to optimize the design process and improve efficiency.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in CADTools is essential for this role, with a strong focus on detail design and product development.
Advanced knowledge of CAD Modeling is highly desirable, with the ability to create and modify complex 3D models.
Familiarity with Geometric dimensioning and tolerance is beneficial, with the capacity to ensure precision in design.
Experience in Mechanical Product development is advantageous, with the ability to contribute to the overall design process.
Proficiency in CADTools is preferred, with the capability to optimize the design process.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 3 years of relevant experience in mechanical product development.
Previous experience in CAD modeling and detail design is beneficial, with a focus on creating and modifying 3D models.
Demonstrated proficiency in CADTools and CAD Modeling through previous design projects.
Proven track record of applying Geometric dimensioning and tolerance and mechanical product development in previous design experiences.




CLUSTER NAME :Engineering Manager Azure Cloud- Legacy Modernisation  - L2
CLUSTER SKILLS : Legacy Modernization (L3), Cloud-Microsoft Azure (L3), DevOps-Terraform (L1), DevOps & DevSecOps - JenkinsX (L2), ContainerOrchestration ScalingKubernetes (L1), Azure OpenAI (L1), Financial Management (L1)
Job Role: Engineering Manager Azure Cloud- Legacy Modernisation

Brief Summary: The Engineering Manager Azure Cloud- Legacy Modernisation will be responsible for leading and managing the legacy modernization process using Azure Cloud technologies. This role will require expertise in Legacy Modernization, Cloud-Microsoft Azure, and DevOps practices.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in Legacy Modernization and Azure Cloud to lead and manage the legacy modernization process.
Apply advanced knowledge of Cloud-Microsoft Azure to architect and implement cloud solutions.
Demonstrate proficiency in DevOps practices to streamline the development and deployment processes.
Utilize Financial Management skills to optimize cost and resource utilization in Azure Cloud.
Apply Container Orchestration Scaling using Kubernetes to ensure efficient container management.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in Legacy Modernization is essential for this role, with a strong focus on modernizing legacy systems.
Advanced knowledge of Cloud-Microsoft Azure is highly desirable, with the ability to architect and implement cloud solutions.
Familiarity with DevOps practices is beneficial, with the capacity to streamline development and deployment.
Experience in Financial Management is advantageous, with the ability to optimize cost and resource utilization.
Proficiency in Container Orchestration Scaling using Kubernetes is preferred, with the capability to ensure efficient container management.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 5 years of relevant experience in Legacy Modernization and Cloud technologies.
Previous experience in Legacy Modernization projects is beneficial, with a focus on modernizing legacy systems.
Demonstrated proficiency in Legacy Modernization and Cloud-Microsoft Azure through previous project experience.
Proven track record of applying DevOps practices and Financial Management in cloud-based projects.




CLUSTER NAME :Designit Analyst Social Listening L4
CLUSTER SKILLS : Project Management (L3), Social Media (L4), Sprinklr (L4)
Job Role: Designit Analyst Social Listening

Brief Summary: The Designit Analyst Social Listening will be responsible for utilizing expertise in Social Media and Sprinklr to analyze and interpret social media data, providing valuable insights and recommendations to enhance brand reputation and customer experience.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in Social Media and Sprinklr to analyze and interpret social media data.
Apply advanced knowledge of Social Media to identify trends, sentiments, and customer preferences.
Demonstrate proficiency in Sprinklr to create reports and dashboards for actionable insights.
Utilize data analysis skills to provide recommendations for brand reputation and customer experience enhancement.
Apply social media listening tools to monitor and track online conversations and trends.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in Social Media is essential for this role, with a strong focus on data analysis and interpretation.
Advanced knowledge of Sprinklr is highly desirable, with the ability to create meaningful reports and dashboards.
Familiarity with social media listening tools is beneficial, with the capacity to extract valuable insights.
Experience in data analysis is advantageous, with the ability to provide actionable recommendations.
Proficiency in project management is preferred, with the capability to handle multiple tasks effectively.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 3 years of relevant experience in social media analysis or digital marketing.
Previous experience in social media listening and data analysis is beneficial, with a focus on extracting actionable insights.
Demonstrated proficiency in Social Media and Sprinklr through previous project management roles.
Proven track record of applying data analysis and social media skills in digital marketing projects.




CLUSTER NAME :TECHNICAL LEAD UNIX APPLICATION INTEGRATION - L1
CLUSTER SKILLS : Legacy Modernization (L2), Multithreading (L3), Unix Application Integration (L3)
Job Role: Technical Lead Unix Application Integration
Brief Summary: The Technical Lead Unix Application Integration will be responsible for utilizing expertise in Legacy Modernization, Multithreading, and Unix Application Integration to lead and oversee the integration of Unix applications.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in Legacy Modernization and Unix Application Integration to lead the modernization of legacy Unix applications.
Apply advanced knowledge of Multithreading to optimize the performance and efficiency of Unix application integration.
Demonstrate proficiency in Legacy Modernization to ensure seamless integration of legacy systems with modern Unix applications.
Utilize Multithreading to handle concurrent processes and improve the overall performance of Unix application integration.
Apply Unix Application Integration skills to design, develop, and implement integrated Unix applications.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in Legacy Modernization is essential for this role, with a strong focus on modernizing legacy systems.
Advanced knowledge of Multithreading is highly desirable, with the ability to optimize concurrent processes.
Familiarity with Unix Application Integration is beneficial, with the capacity to seamlessly integrate Unix applications.
Experience in Legacy Modernization is advantageous, with the ability to modernize and upgrade legacy Unix systems.
Proficiency in Multithreading is preferred, with the capability to handle concurrent processes effectively.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 5 years of relevant experience in Unix application integration.
Previous experience in legacy modernization is beneficial, with a focus on modernizing legacy Unix systems.
Demonstrated proficiency in Legacy Modernization and Multithreading through previous experience.
Proven track record of applying Unix Application Integration and Multithreading in real-world integration projects.




CLUSTER NAME :LEAD ADMINISTRATOR WEBSERVICES INTEGRATION - L2
CLUSTER SKILLS : Fuse (L2), Jenkins (L1), Kubernetes (L2), IBM MQ Infra Admin (L2), IBM Integration Bus (IIB) (L1), IBM App Connect Enterprise (L2), IBM CLOUD PAK for Integration (L3)
Job Role: Lead Administrator Webservices Integration - L2

Brief Summary: The Lead Administrator Webservices Integration - L2 will be responsible for utilizing expertise in Fuse, Jenkins, Kubernetes, IBM MQ Infra Admin, IBM Integration Bus (IIB), IBM App Connect Enterprise, and IBM CLOUD PAK for Integration to manage and administer webservices integration.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in Fuse and Jenkins to manage and administer webservices integration.
Apply advanced knowledge of Kubernetes to optimize and maintain webservices integration infrastructure.
Demonstrate proficiency in IBM MQ Infra Admin to ensure seamless messaging for webservices integration.
Utilize IBM Integration Bus (IIB) to design and implement effective integration solutions.
Apply IBM App Connect Enterprise to streamline and automate webservices integration processes.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in Fuse is essential for this role, with a strong focus on managing and administering webservices integration.
Advanced knowledge of Jenkins is highly desirable, with the ability to optimize and automate integration processes.
Familiarity with Kubernetes is beneficial, with the capacity to maintain and scale webservices integration infrastructure.
Experience in IBM MQ Infra Admin is advantageous, with the ability to ensure reliable messaging for integration.
Proficiency in IBM App Connect Enterprise is preferred, with the capability to streamline and automate integration processes.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 3 years of relevant experience in webservices integration.
Previous experience in managing and administering webservices integration is beneficial, with a focus on optimizing integration processes.
Demonstrated proficiency in Fuse and Jenkins through previous experience in webservices integration.
Proven track record of applying IBM MQ Infra Admin and IBM Integration Bus in webservices integration projects.




CLUSTER NAME :Solution Architect Remote Management  - Logmein - L1
CLUSTER SKILLS : Windows Server Admin (L1), Consulting (L2), LogmeIn (L4)
Job Role: Solution Architect Remote Management

Brief Summary: The Solution Architect Remote Management will be responsible for utilizing expertise in Windows Server Admin and Consulting to provide remote management solutions using LogmeIn.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in Windows Server Admin and Consulting to provide remote management solutions using LogmeIn.
Apply advanced knowledge of LogmeIn to optimize remote management processes and systems.
Demonstrate proficiency in solution architecture to design and implement effective remote management solutions.
Utilize Windows Server Admin skills to troubleshoot and maintain remote management infrastructure.
Apply Consulting skills to provide expert guidance and support for remote management strategies.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in Windows Server Admin is essential for this role, with a strong focus on remote server management.
Advanced knowledge of Consulting is highly desirable, with the ability to provide expert guidance on remote management solutions.
Familiarity with LogmeIn is beneficial, with the capacity to optimize remote management processes.
Experience in solution architecture is advantageous, with the ability to design and implement effective remote management solutions.
Proficiency in remote management is preferred, with the capability to troubleshoot and maintain remote infrastructure.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 3 years of relevant experience in remote management solutions.
Previous experience in consulting for remote management is beneficial, with a focus on optimizing LogmeIn.
Demonstrated proficiency in Windows Server Admin and Consulting through previous remote management experience.
Proven track record of applying solution architecture and LogmeIn in remote management solutions.




CLUSTER NAME :SOLUTION ARCHITECT HCL COMMERCE  FRONTEND - L3
CLUSTER SKILLS : eCommerce DevOps (L3), Architecting (L3), Spring Boot (L3), Microservices (L3), HCL Commerce Cloud (L4), Angular 15 (L3)
Job Role: Solution Architect HCL Commerce Frontend

Brief Summary: As a Solution Architect HCL Commerce Frontend, you will be responsible for utilizing expertise in eCommerce DevOps, Architecting, Spring Boot, Microservices, HCL Commerce Cloud, and Angular 15 to design and implement frontend solutions for HCL Commerce projects.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in eCommerce DevOps and Architecting to design and implement robust frontend solutions for HCL Commerce projects.
Apply advanced knowledge of Spring Boot and Microservices to develop scalable and efficient frontend architecture.
Demonstrate proficiency in HCL Commerce Cloud to integrate and customize frontend components for optimal performance.
Utilize Angular 15 to create responsive and user-friendly frontend interfaces for HCL Commerce applications.
Apply eCommerce DevOps practices to ensure seamless deployment and maintenance of frontend solutions.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in eCommerce DevOps is essential for this role, with a strong focus on continuous integration and deployment.
Advanced knowledge of Architecting is highly desirable, with the ability to design scalable and resilient frontend architecture.
Familiarity with Spring Boot is beneficial, with the capacity to develop efficient backend services for frontend integration.
Experience in Microservices is advantageous, with the ability to design and implement modular frontend components.
Proficiency in HCL Commerce Cloud is preferred, with the capability to customize and integrate frontend solutions for commerce projects.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 5 years of relevant experience in eCommerce or related field.
Previous experience in frontend architecture and development is beneficial, with a focus on creating engaging user interfaces.
Demonstrated proficiency in eCommerce DevOps and Architecting through previous project implementations.
Proven track record of applying Spring Boot and Microservices in developing frontend solutions for commerce applications.




CLUSTER NAME :TECHNO FUNCTIONAL CONSULTANT BANKING - PAYMENTS - L4
CLUSTER SKILLS : Data Analysis (L3), PL-SQL (L4), Payments (L4), Business Analysis (L3), Program Management (L3)
Job Role: 
Techno Functional Consultant Banking - Payments
The Techno Functional Consultant Banking - Payments is responsible for utilizing expertise in data analysis, PL-SQL, and payments to provide technical and functional support in the banking industry, with a focus on payments.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in data analysis and Techno Functional Consultant Banking - Payments to provide technical and functional support in the banking industry.
Apply advanced knowledge of PL-SQL to develop and maintain database solutions for banking payments.
Demonstrate proficiency in payments to analyze, design, and implement payment systems and processes.
Utilize business analysis skills to gather and document requirements for payment-related projects.
Apply program management skills to oversee and coordinate payment system implementations and enhancements.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in data analysis is essential for this role, with a strong focus on analyzing and interpreting complex data sets.
Advanced knowledge of PL-SQL is highly desirable, with the ability to develop and optimize database solutions for payment systems.
Familiarity with payments is beneficial, with the capacity to analyze, design, and implement payment processes.
Experience in business analysis is advantageous, with the ability to gather and document requirements for payment projects.
Proficiency in program management is preferred, with the capability to oversee and coordinate payment system implementations.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 5 years of relevant experience in the banking or financial industry.
Previous experience in payments or banking technology is beneficial, with a focus on proficiency in payment systems.
Demonstrated proficiency in data analysis and PL-SQL through previous banking or financial industry experience.
Proven track record of applying business analysis and program management skills in banking payment projects.




CLUSTER NAME :DOMAIN CONSULTANT P AND C INSURANCE - L2
CLUSTER SKILLS : PL-SQL (L1), P and C Insurance (L2), Personal Lines Insurance (L1), Product Management Consulting (L1)
Job Role: Domain Consultant P and C Insurance

Brief Summary: As a Domain Consultant P and C Insurance, you will be responsible for utilizing expertise in PL-SQL and P and C Insurance to provide consulting services in the personal lines insurance domain. You will apply advanced knowledge of P and C Insurance to analyze and improve product management strategies for insurance products.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in PL-SQL and P and C Insurance to provide consulting services in the personal lines insurance domain.
Apply advanced knowledge of P and C Insurance to analyze and improve product management strategies for insurance products.
Demonstrate proficiency in Personal Lines Insurance to support the development and implementation of insurance products.
Utilize Product Management Consulting to provide expert guidance on product development and management in the insurance industry.
Apply PL-SQL to analyze and optimize data for insurance product management.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in PL-SQL is essential for this role, with a strong focus on data analysis and optimization.
Advanced knowledge of P and C Insurance is highly desirable, with the ability to analyze and improve product management strategies.
Familiarity with Personal Lines Insurance is beneficial, with the capacity to support the development and implementation of insurance products.
Experience in Product Management Consulting is advantageous, with the ability to provide expert guidance on product development and management.
Proficiency in PL-SQL is preferred, with the capability to analyze and optimize data for insurance product management.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 3 years of relevant experience in the insurance industry.
Previous experience in product management consulting is beneficial, with a focus on analyzing and improving insurance product strategies.
Demonstrated proficiency in PL-SQL and P and C Insurance through consulting and product management experience.
Proven track record of applying Personal Lines Insurance and Product Management Consulting in the insurance industry.




CLUSTER NAME :TECHNO FUNCTIONAL CONSULTANT ORACLE RETAIL SUPPLY CHAIN - L4
CLUSTER SKILLS : Oracle Retail (L4), Oracle Retail Logistic Modules (L3), Oracle Retail Solutions (L4)
Job Role: Technical Functional Consultant Oracle Retail Supply Chain
The Technical Functional Consultant Oracle Retail Supply Chain will be responsible for utilizing expertise in Oracle Retail Solutions to provide advanced technical and functional support for supply chain operations within the Oracle Retail environment.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in Oracle Retail (L4) and Oracle Retail Logistic Modules (L3) to provide advanced technical and functional support for supply chain operations.
Apply advanced knowledge of Oracle Retail Solutions (L4) to design and implement efficient supply chain processes.
Demonstrate proficiency in Oracle Retail Logistic Modules (L3) to troubleshoot and optimize supply chain workflows.
Utilize Oracle Retail (L4) to customize and configure supply chain solutions based on business requirements.
Apply Oracle Retail Solutions (L4) to integrate supply chain processes with other retail systems.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in Oracle Retail (L4) is essential for this role, with a strong focus on customizing and optimizing supply chain processes.
Advanced knowledge of Oracle Retail Logistic Modules (L3) is highly desirable, with the ability to design and implement efficient supply chain workflows.
Familiarity with Oracle Retail Solutions (L4) is beneficial, with the capacity to provide advanced technical and functional support for supply chain operations.
Experience in Oracle Retail (L4) is advantageous, with the ability to customize and configure supply chain solutions based on business requirements.
Proficiency in Oracle Retail Logistic Modules (L3) is preferred, with the capability to troubleshoot and optimize supply chain workflows.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 5 years of relevant experience in Oracle Retail or related field.
Previous experience in implementing Oracle Retail Solutions is beneficial, with a focus on customizing and optimizing supply chain processes.
Demonstrated proficiency in Oracle Retail (L4) and Oracle Retail Logistic Modules (L3) through successful implementation and support of supply chain operations.
Proven track record of applying Oracle Retail Solutions (L4) and Oracle Retail Logistic Modules (L3) in retail supply chain management.




CLUSTER NAME :INCIDENT COORDINATOR AMS DELIVERY EXCELLENCE - L1
CLUSTER SKILLS : AMS Incident Management (L1), AMS Problem Management (L1)
Job Role: AMS Incident Coordinator

Brief Summary: The AMS Incident Coordinator will be responsible for managing and coordinating incident management activities to ensure timely resolution and minimal impact on business operations.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in AMS Incident Management (L1) and AMS Problem Management (L1) to coordinate and manage incident resolution processes.
Apply advanced knowledge of AMS Delivery Excellence - L1 to ensure delivery of high-quality incident management services.
Demonstrate proficiency in incident coordination and communication to stakeholders.
Utilize AMS Delivery Excellence - L1 to drive continuous improvement in incident management processes.
Apply problem management skills to identify and address root causes of incidents.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in AMS Incident Management (L1) is essential for this role, with a strong focus on coordinating incident resolution.
Advanced knowledge of AMS Problem Management (L1) is highly desirable, with the ability to drive problem-solving activities.
Familiarity with AMS Delivery Excellence - L1 is beneficial, with the capacity to ensure high-quality service delivery.
Experience in incident coordination is advantageous, with the ability to communicate effectively with stakeholders.
Proficiency in problem management is preferred, with the capability to identify and address root causes of incidents.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 3 years of relevant experience in AMS incident management.
Previous experience in coordinating incident resolution is beneficial, with a focus on delivering high-quality services.
Demonstrated proficiency in AMS Incident Management (L1) and AMS Problem Management (L1) through hands-on experience.
Proven track record of applying AMS Delivery Excellence - L1 and problem management skills in incident management processes.




CLUSTER NAME :SOLUTION ARCHITECT UI/UX DESIGN - L2
CLUSTER SKILLS : HTML 5 (L4), CSS3 (L4), Visual Design (L4), Experience Design (L4)
Job Role: Solution Architect UI/UX Design

Brief Summary: The Solution Architect UI/UX Design will be responsible for utilizing expertise in HTML 5, CSS3, Visual Design, and Experience Design to architect and design user interfaces and experiences for various projects.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in HTML 5 and CSS3 to architect and design user interfaces for web applications.
Apply advanced knowledge of Visual Design to create visually appealing and user-friendly interfaces.
Demonstrate proficiency in Experience Design to ensure seamless and intuitive user experiences.
Utilize HTML 5 and CSS3 to ensure responsive and cross-browser compatible designs.
Apply Visual Design principles to create engaging and aesthetically pleasing user interfaces.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in HTML 5 is essential for this role, with a strong focus on creating responsive web designs.
Advanced knowledge of CSS3 is highly desirable, with the ability to implement complex style requirements.
Familiarity with Visual Design is beneficial, with the capacity to create visually appealing interfaces.
Experience in Experience Design is advantageous, with the ability to design intuitive user experiences.
Proficiency in HTML 5 and CSS3 is preferred, with the capability to create cross-browser compatible designs.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 3 years of relevant experience in UI/UX design.
Previous experience in web application design is beneficial, with a focus on creating visually appealing interfaces.
Demonstrated proficiency in HTML 5 and CSS3 through previous UI/UX design projects.
Proven track record of applying Visual Design and Experience Design in UI/UX design projects.




CLUSTER NAME :INCIDENT MANAGER ITIL - INCIDENT REQUEST MANAGEMENT - L1
CLUSTER SKILLS : ITIL Incident Mgmt (L2), ITIL Problem Mgmt (L1), ITIL Change Mgmt (L1), ITIL - Event and Request Fulfillment (L1), Effective Communication (L1), ServiceNow - IT Service Management (L1)
Job Role: Incident Manager

Brief Summary: The Incident Manager is responsible for overseeing and managing the ITIL Incident Management process, ensuring timely resolution of incidents and minimizing impact on business operations.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in ITIL Incident Management to oversee and manage the resolution of all incidents.
Apply advanced knowledge of Effective Communication to ensure clear and concise communication with stakeholders during incident management.
Demonstrate proficiency in ServiceNow - IT Service Management to effectively utilize the ITSM tool for incident tracking and resolution.
Utilize ITIL Problem Management to identify and address underlying problems causing incidents.
Apply ITIL Change Management to ensure proper assessment and implementation of changes to prevent future incidents.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in ITIL Incident Management is essential for this role, with a strong focus on timely incident resolution.
Advanced knowledge of Effective Communication is highly desirable, with the ability to communicate clearly during high-pressure incidents.
Familiarity with ServiceNow - IT Service Management is beneficial, with the capacity to effectively use the ITSM tool for incident tracking.
Experience in ITIL Problem Management is advantageous, with the ability to identify and address underlying problems causing incidents.
Proficiency in ITIL Change Management is preferred, with the capability to assess and implement changes to prevent future incidents.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 2 years of relevant experience in IT Service Management.
Previous experience in incident and problem management is beneficial, with a focus on timely incident resolution.
Demonstrated proficiency in ITIL Incident Management and Effective Communication through previous incident management roles.
Proven track record of applying ITIL Problem Management and ITIL Change Management in incident management scenarios.




CLUSTER NAME :LEAD ADMINISTRATOR SERVICENOW IMPLEMENTATION - L3
CLUSTER SKILLS : Servicenow -Customer Service Management (L3), ServiceNow - IT Service Management (L3), ServiceNow - IT Business Management (L3), ServiceNow Discovery (L3)
Job Role: Lead Administrator ServiceNow Implementation

Brief Summary: The Lead Administrator ServiceNow Implementation will be responsible for utilizing expertise in ServiceNow platforms to lead and oversee the implementation of ServiceNow solutions. They will play a crucial role in ensuring the successful deployment and management of ServiceNow applications.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in ServiceNow - Customer Service Management (L3) and Lead Administrator ServiceNow Implementation to lead and oversee the implementation of ServiceNow solutions.
Apply advanced knowledge of ServiceNow - IT Service Management (L3) to ensure efficient IT service delivery and support processes.
Demonstrate proficiency in ServiceNow - IT Business Management (L3) to align IT with business goals and objectives.
Utilize ServiceNow Discovery (L3) to automate the discovery and mapping of IT infrastructure.
Apply ServiceNow - IT Operations Management (L3) to optimize IT operations and infrastructure performance.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in ServiceNow - Customer Service Management (L3) is essential for this role, with a strong focus on implementing and managing customer service solutions.
Advanced knowledge of ServiceNow - IT Service Management (L3) is highly desirable, with the ability to streamline IT service delivery and support processes.
Familiarity with ServiceNow - IT Business Management (L3) is beneficial, with the capacity to align IT with business goals and objectives.
Experience in ServiceNow Discovery (L3) is advantageous, with the ability to automate the discovery and mapping of IT infrastructure.
Proficiency in ServiceNow - IT Operations Management (L3) is preferred, with the capability to optimize IT operations and infrastructure performance.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 5 years of relevant experience in ServiceNow implementation and administration.
Previous experience in leading ServiceNow implementation projects is beneficial, with a focus on successful deployment and management of ServiceNow applications.
Demonstrated proficiency in ServiceNow - Customer Service Management (L3) and ServiceNow - IT Service Management (L3) through successful implementation and management of customer service and IT service solutions.
Proven track record of applying ServiceNow - IT Business Management (L3) and ServiceNow Discovery (L3) in optimizing IT operations and aligning IT with business goals.




CLUSTER NAME :LEAD ADMINISTRATOR L2
CLUSTER SKILLS : Cloud Infra Admin (L3), Problem Solving (L3), Technical Troubleshooting (L3)
Job Role: Lead Administrator

Brief Summary: As a Lead Administrator, you will be responsible for overseeing and managing the technical aspects of cloud infrastructure administration. You will utilize your expertise in problem solving and technical troubleshooting to ensure smooth operations and resolve complex issues.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in Cloud Infra Admin (L3) and Lead Administrator to oversee and manage the cloud infrastructure administration.
Apply advanced knowledge of Problem Solving (L3) to analyze and resolve complex technical issues.
Demonstrate proficiency in Technical Troubleshooting (L3) to identify and troubleshoot technical problems effectively.
Utilize Lead Administrator skills to provide leadership and guidance to the administration team.
Apply Problem Solving (L3) skills to proactively identify and address potential technical challenges.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in Cloud Infra Admin (L3) is essential for this role, with a strong focus on managing cloud infrastructure effectively.
Advanced knowledge of Problem Solving (L3) is highly desirable, with the ability to analyze and resolve complex technical issues.
Familiarity with Technical Troubleshooting (L3) is beneficial, with the capacity to identify and troubleshoot technical problems effectively.
Experience in Lead Administrator (L2) is advantageous, with the ability to provide leadership and guidance to the administration team.
Proficiency in Cloud Infra Admin (L3) is preferred, with the capability to effectively manage cloud infrastructure.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 5 years of relevant experience in cloud infrastructure administration.
Previous experience in lead administration is beneficial, with a focus on providing leadership and guidance.
Demonstrated proficiency in Cloud Infra Admin (L3) and Problem Solving (L3) through previous experience.
Proven track record of applying Technical Troubleshooting (L3) and Lead Administrator (L2) skills in cloud infrastructure administration.




CLUSTER NAME :Tools Consultant ASSET MANAGEMENT  - Discovery - L1
CLUSTER SKILLS : MF uCMDB (L3), Windows Server Admin (L1), Unix Admin (L1), Consulting (L1), ITIL Asset-Config Mgmt (L2), BMC Helix Remedy Force (L3), BMC Helix CMDB (L3), Software Asset Management (L2), IT Hardware Asset Management (L2), BMC Helix Discovery (L3), IBM Tivoli App Dependency Discovery Mgr (L2)
Job Role: Tools Consultant ASSET MANAGEMENT - Discovery

Brief Summary: The Tools Consultant ASSET MANAGEMENT - Discovery will be responsible for utilizing expertise in MF uCMDB, BMC Helix Remedy Force, BMC Helix CMDB, BMC Helix Discovery, and IBM Tivoli App Dependency Discovery Mgr to provide effective asset management and discovery solutions.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in MF uCMDB and Tools Consultant ASSET MANAGEMENT - Discovery to provide effective asset management solutions.
Apply advanced knowledge of BMC Helix Remedy Force to ensure efficient IT service management.
Demonstrate proficiency in BMC Helix CMDB to maintain accurate and up-to-date configuration data.
Utilize BMC Helix Discovery to identify and manage IT assets across the organization.
Apply IBM Tivoli App Dependency Discovery Mgr to analyze application dependencies and optimize performance.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in MF uCMDB is essential for this role, with a strong focus on asset management and discovery.
Advanced knowledge of BMC Helix Remedy Force is highly desirable, with the ability to streamline IT service management processes.
Familiarity with BMC Helix CMDB is beneficial, with the capacity to maintain accurate configuration data.
Experience in BMC Helix Discovery is advantageous, with the ability to identify and manage IT assets effectively.
Proficiency in IBM Tivoli App Dependency Discovery Mgr is preferred, with the capability to analyze application dependencies.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 3 years of relevant experience in asset management and discovery.
Previous experience in ITIL Asset-Config Mgmt is beneficial, with a focus on maintaining configuration data.
Demonstrated proficiency in MF uCMDB and BMC Helix Remedy Force through previous experience.
Proven track record of applying BMC Helix CMDB and BMC Helix Discovery in asset management and discovery.




CLUSTER NAME :Engagement Partner UTILITIES - L3
CLUSTER SKILLS : Utilities Transmission and Distribution (L4), Utilities Transmission and Distribution (L4), Utilities Transmission and Distribution (L4), Utilities Transmission and Distribution (L4), Project Management Utilities (L4), Project Management Utilities (L4), Project Management Utilities (L4), Project Management Utilities (L4), Work Asset Management (L4), Work Asset Management (L4), Work Asset Management (L4), Work Asset Management (L4)
Job Role: Engagement Partner UTILITIES
The Engagement Partner UTILITIES will be responsible for leading and managing the delivery of utility transmission and distribution projects, utilizing advanced project management skills and expertise in work asset management.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in Utilities Transmission and Distribution (L4) and Project Management Utilities (L4) to lead and manage the delivery of utility transmission and distribution projects.
Apply advanced knowledge of Work Asset Management (L4) to optimize the utilization of assets and resources in utility projects.
Demonstrate proficiency in Engagement Partner UTILITIES (L3) to effectively engage with stakeholders and ensure successful project delivery.
Utilize Project Management Utilities (L4) to plan, execute, and monitor utility projects, ensuring adherence to timelines and budgets.
Apply Utilities Transmission and Distribution (L4) to ensure the efficient and reliable transmission and distribution of utility services.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in Utilities Transmission and Distribution (L4) is essential for this role, with a strong focus on optimizing transmission and distribution systems.
Advanced knowledge of Project Management Utilities (L4) is highly desirable, with the ability to effectively plan, execute, and monitor utility projects.
Familiarity with Work Asset Management (L4) is beneficial, with the capacity to optimize asset utilization and maintenance in utility projects.
Experience in Engagement Partner UTILITIES (L3) is advantageous, with the ability to effectively engage with stakeholders and drive project success.
Proficiency in utilities transmission and distribution is preferred, with the capability to ensure the efficient and reliable delivery of utility services.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 5 years of relevant experience in the utilities industry.
Previous experience in project management utilities is beneficial, with a focus on successful delivery of utility projects.
Demonstrated proficiency in utilities transmission and distribution and project management utilities through previous project management experience.
Proven track record of applying work asset management and utilities transmission and distribution in utility project delivery.




CLUSTER NAME :SOLUTION ARCHITECT FULLSTACK FRONTEND - L1
CLUSTER SKILLS : Architecting (L1), Channel Apps CI/CD (L1), Web Accessibility (L2), Multi-platform App UI (L2), AWS Amplify (L1), Angular 15 (L3)
Job Role: Solution Architect Fullstack Frontend - L1
Brief Summary: The Solution Architect Fullstack Frontend - L1 will be responsible for utilizing expertise in Angular 15 and AWS Amplify to architect and develop frontend solutions for multi-platform applications with a focus on web accessibility and channel apps CI/CD.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in Angular 15 and AWS Amplify to architect and develop frontend solutions for multi-platform applications.
Apply advanced knowledge of Web Accessibility to ensure inclusive user interfaces for the developed applications.
Demonstrate proficiency in Channel Apps CI/CD to streamline the continuous integration and continuous deployment processes.
Utilize AWS Amplify to implement scalable and efficient frontend solutions.
Apply Angular 15 to develop responsive and dynamic user interfaces for the multi-platform applications.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in Angular 15 is essential for this role, with a strong focus on developing dynamic user interfaces.
Advanced knowledge of AWS Amplify is highly desirable, with the ability to implement scalable and efficient frontend solutions.
Familiarity with Web Accessibility is beneficial, with the capacity to ensure inclusive user interfaces.
Experience in Channel Apps CI/CD is advantageous, with the ability to streamline continuous integration and deployment processes.
Proficiency in Multi-platform App UI is preferred, with the capability to develop responsive user interfaces.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 5 years of relevant experience in frontend development and architecture.
Previous experience in developing multi-platform app UI is beneficial, with a focus on creating dynamic and responsive interfaces.
Demonstrated proficiency in Angular 15 and AWS Amplify through previous frontend development projects.
Proven track record of applying Web Accessibility and Channel Apps CI/CD in frontend development experiences.




CLUSTER NAME :DOMAIN CONSULTANT CORPORATE BANKING - L4
CLUSTER SKILLS : PL-SQL (L3), Corporate Banking (L4), Project Management (L3), Agile-Scrum (L3)
Job Role: Domain Consultant Corporate Banking

Brief Summary: As a Domain Consultant Corporate Banking, you will be responsible for utilizing expertise in PL-SQL and Corporate Banking to provide advanced solutions and project management in the banking domain.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in PL-SQL and Corporate Banking to provide advanced solutions and project management in the banking domain.
Apply advanced knowledge of Project Management to ensure efficient execution of corporate banking projects.
Demonstrate proficiency in Agile-Scrum to streamline project delivery and enhance collaboration within the corporate banking domain.
Utilize Corporate Banking domain knowledge to provide strategic insights and solutions for banking clients.
Apply PL-SQL skills to develop and optimize database solutions for corporate banking operations.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in PL-SQL is essential for this role, with a strong focus on database management and optimization.
Advanced knowledge of Corporate Banking is highly desirable, with the ability to provide strategic insights and solutions for banking clients.
Familiarity with Project Management is beneficial, with the capacity to ensure efficient execution of corporate banking projects.
Experience in Agile-Scrum is advantageous, with the ability to streamline project delivery and enhance collaboration within the corporate banking domain.
Proficiency in PL-SQL is preferred, with the capability to develop and optimize database solutions for corporate banking operations.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 5 years of relevant experience in the corporate banking industry.
Previous experience in project management and database optimization in the corporate banking domain is beneficial, with a focus on delivering advanced solutions.
Demonstrated proficiency in PL-SQL and Project Management through successful project implementations.
Proven track record of applying Agile-Scrum and Corporate Banking knowledge in enhancing banking operations.




CLUSTER NAME :DEVOPS LEAD AWS DEVOPS - L1
CLUSTER SKILLS : Unix Shell Scripting (L4), Project Delivery (L1), DevOps (L4), Cloud AWS Devops (L4), AWS Devops Operations (L4)
Job Role: DevOps Lead AWS DevOps

Brief Summary: The DevOps Lead AWS DevOps is responsible for leading the implementation and management of DevOps practices and tools within the AWS environment. This role involves utilizing expertise in Unix Shell Scripting, Project Delivery, DevOps, Cloud AWS DevOps, and AWS DevOps Operations to drive efficient and effective delivery of software and infrastructure.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in Unix Shell Scripting and DevOps Lead AWS DevOps to lead the implementation and management of DevOps practices within the AWS environment.
Apply advanced knowledge of Project Delivery to ensure smooth and efficient project delivery processes.
Demonstrate proficiency in DevOps and Cloud AWS DevOps to optimize the cloud infrastructure and deployment processes.
Utilize AWS DevOps Operations to maintain and enhance the operational efficiency of AWS-based systems.
Apply DevOps practices to automate and streamline the software development and deployment processes.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in Unix Shell Scripting is essential for this role, with a strong focus on automation and infrastructure management.
Advanced knowledge of Project Delivery is highly desirable, with the ability to coordinate and manage project timelines and resources effectively.
Familiarity with DevOps is beneficial, with the capacity to implement continuous integration and continuous delivery pipelines.
Experience in Cloud AWS DevOps is advantageous, with the ability to design and implement scalable and reliable cloud solutions.
Proficiency in AWS DevOps Operations is preferred, with the capability to monitor, troubleshoot, and optimize AWS infrastructure.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 5 years of relevant experience in DevOps and AWS environment.
Previous experience in leading DevOps practices within AWS environment is beneficial, with a focus on implementing automation and infrastructure as code.
Demonstrated proficiency in Unix Shell Scripting and Project Delivery through successful implementation and delivery of projects.
Proven track record of applying DevOps and Cloud AWS DevOps in optimizing software development and deployment processes.




CLUSTER NAME :SALES - PARTNER MARKET DEVELOPMENT LEAD L3
CLUSTER SKILLS : Business Continuity (L3), Leadership (L3), Marketing (L3), Marketing Campaigning (L3)
Job Role: Sales - Partner Market Development Lead

Brief Summary: The Sales - Partner Market Development Lead is responsible for driving the development and execution of marketing campaigns to support partner sales initiatives. This role requires strong leadership and business continuity skills to effectively drive partner market development.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in Business Continuity and Leadership to drive the development and execution of marketing campaigns for partner sales initiatives.
Apply advanced knowledge of Marketing to create and implement effective marketing strategies to support partner sales.
Demonstrate proficiency in Marketing Campaigning to optimize partner market development and drive sales growth.
Utilize Sales skills to collaborate with partners and drive joint marketing activities.
Apply Leadership skills to lead and mentor the partner marketing team for successful market development.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in Business Continuity is essential for this role, with a strong focus on maintaining partner relationships and market stability.
Advanced knowledge of Leadership is highly desirable, with the ability to lead and inspire the partner marketing team.
Familiarity with Marketing is beneficial, with the capacity to develop and implement effective marketing strategies.
Experience in Marketing Campaigning is advantageous, with the ability to create impactful marketing campaigns for partner sales.
Proficiency in Sales is preferred, with the capability to collaborate with partners and drive joint marketing activities.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 5 years of relevant experience in Sales and Marketing.
Previous experience in partner marketing development is beneficial, with a focus on driving sales growth through effective marketing strategies.
Demonstrated proficiency in Business Continuity and Leadership through successful market development initiatives.
Proven track record of applying Marketing Campaigning and Sales skills in driving partner sales growth.




CLUSTER NAME :ACCOUNT EXECUTIVE L3
CLUSTER SKILLS : Sales (L2), Sales (L2), Sales (L2), Sales (L2), Sales Operations (L2), Sales Operations (L2), Sales Operations (L2), Sales Operations (L2), Finance (L1), Finance (L1), Finance (L1), Finance (L1)
Job Role: Account Executive

Brief Summary: The Account Executive will be responsible for driving sales and managing client accounts to achieve revenue targets. They will utilize expertise in sales and sales operations to build and maintain strong client relationships and drive business growth.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in Sales and Account Executive to drive sales and meet revenue targets.
Apply advanced knowledge of Sales Operations to streamline processes and improve efficiency.
Demonstrate proficiency in Finance to manage client accounts and financial transactions.
Utilize Sales to identify new business opportunities and expand client base.
Apply Sales Operations to optimize sales processes and enhance customer experience.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in Sales is essential for this role, with a strong focus on driving revenue and meeting targets.
Advanced knowledge of Sales Operations is highly desirable, with the ability to streamline processes and improve efficiency.
Familiarity with Finance is beneficial, with the capacity to manage client accounts and financial transactions.
Experience in Sales is advantageous, with the ability to identify new business opportunities and expand the client base.
Proficiency in Sales Operations is preferred, with the capability to optimize sales processes and enhance customer experience.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 3 years of relevant experience in Sales and Sales Operations.
Previous experience in client account management is beneficial, with a focus on driving revenue and meeting targets.
Demonstrated proficiency in Sales and Sales Operations through successful client account management.
Proven track record of applying Finance and Sales Operations in driving business growth.




CLUSTER NAME :SALES OPERATIONS MANAGER L1
CLUSTER SKILLS : Consulting Presales (L2), Consulting Presales (L2), Consulting Presales (L2), Consulting Presales (L2), Sales (L3), Sales (L3), Sales (L3), Sales (L3), Sales Operations (L3), Sales Operations (L3), Sales Operations (L3), Sales Operations (L3), Presales (L3), Presales (L3), Presales (L3), Presales (L3)
Job Role: Sales Operations Manager

Brief Summary: The Sales Operations Manager is responsible for overseeing the sales operations and processes within the organization. They play a crucial role in optimizing sales performance, streamlining processes, and driving revenue growth.

Key Responsibilities:
Utilize expertise in Consulting Presales (L2) and Sales Operations (L3) to optimize sales processes and drive revenue growth.
Apply advanced knowledge of Sales (L3) to develop and implement sales strategies for improved performance.
Demonstrate proficiency in Presales (L3) to support the sales team in pre-sales activities and customer engagement.
Utilize Consulting Presales (L2) to provide technical expertise and support in pre-sales activities.
Apply Sales Operations (L3) to streamline sales processes and improve operational efficiency.

Qualifications and Skills:
Proficiency in Consulting Presales (L2) is essential for this role, with a strong focus on technical pre-sales support.
Advanced knowledge of Sales (L3) is highly desirable, with the ability to develop and implement sales strategies.
Familiarity with Presales (L3) is beneficial, with the capacity to support pre-sales activities and customer engagement.
Experience in Sales Operations (L3) is advantageous, with the ability to streamline sales processes and improve operational efficiency.
Proficiency in Consulting Presales (L2) is preferred, with the capability to provide technical expertise in pre-sales activities.

Experience Requirements:
A minimum of 3 years of relevant experience in sales operations or related field.
Previous experience in sales operations or sales management is beneficial, with a focus on optimizing sales performance.
Demonstrated proficiency in Consulting Presales (L2) and Sales (L3) through previous sales operations experience.
Proven track record of applying Presales (L3) and Sales Operations (L3) in sales management or related roles.



